We will be having another Scrapbook Charity Day on Saturday, 19 May, at the Wilro Park Baptist Church. It's going to be an action packed day as we are going to do TWO double layouts!
Rose Pouchong and Almond Cupcakes
The devotional went on to answer this question with Matthew 18:21-35… Guess what readers? We DON’T draw the line. Christ did that when he died for and as us on the cross. If we think we have any right under any circumstances to deny someone forgiveness, we are foolishly denying forgiveness that Christ has already extended on our behalf and undermining his greatest sacrifice.
Voting ends at 8PM tonight, and we should know the outcome tomorrow.
Wait. What does that say for me if I am not heeding his every bit of advice? Oh well.
After my thematic audit of the speech, my conclusion is simple: It was the controversy that the PDP stirred with their overstretched debate on zoning and the eventual victory of the PDP candidate – in an election judged as fair – that engendered the momentum fordisgruntled opposition politicians to abet the metamorphosis of Boko Haram.
It explained that it decided to take the action as a result of several incidents such as Ministers being barred from addressing Kgotla meetings.
To find out who the nominees are and start preparing for the ultimate book battle, you can visit the official DABWAHA website. And no, I have no idea what DABWAHA stands for, but I bet is long and it makes no sense.
In order to keep up with product distribution, the fluctuation of purchase, and global organization, Coca-Cola assuredly uses accurate visual tools. MarketMAPS provides companies like Coca-Cola with accurate geography and detailed demographics, to give them the best planning tool. Along with custom logos, labels, icons, color shading, and whatever else you could need, we provide you with a geographic visual that best represents your business.
Just thought I'd share this photo with y'all. It's a shot of new "stainless" be delivered to the Hop 'n Keg Brewery located in the Quarry Steakhouse in Vernal, Utah. Looks like Utah's seventeenth brewery will soon be a reality.
I want them to exist in real life. I need them to be real, actual people. They are the most fully realized, multi-dimensional, realistic characters on television. They screw up, they fight, they try their hardest and sometimes they fail; they can be petty, proud, smart and funny; they wallow in their failures and revel in their victories no matter how small; and they love the hell out of each other – their daughters, their town and the kids they work with.
One weekend we stayed in the Waikiki condo and hit the streets for a night. That's about all I can really take of that city. From there we swam with the fishies in Hanauma Bay. It might be touristy but it's totally worth it.
Angel Hair Carbonara, Truffle Oil, Assorted Mushrooms in Balsamic/Muscovado Reduction
Then I got the very exciting call I'd been waiting for from my agent.
“No thanks!” the Ranger chuckled as he ran toward the landing strip in a combat crouch.
4) Write your own interpretation of the poem?
I 'know', from my own experience, that the difference is simply between feeling separate, isolated, lonely, lost.....and feeling 'at-one', whole, home.
FH: I learnt from my own experience that a background of encouragement was really important for a child - so I always encouraged my children in what they wanted to do. So I suppose happiness for me is seeing that they’ve turned out well and capable and that they are good people...and that’s another thing too - getting on well with my fellow human beings that's important for my happiness too.
and I can tell you this much the girls have been saying they can not wait to see all the projects this time!! they have had a great time creating!
Deep love and emotions. Guilty as charged. I only know how to feel deeply. I have no shallow attachments. That's why it's hard when I miss loved ones who live far away from me. That's why I was present at the hospital for my dad, and just now for my gram and my father-in-law as they moved on from this life and passed to the other side. My love is a love to the end. To the last breath.
Because of spoilers, I knew about the Max twist a couple weeks ago. That plot just goes to show how many storylines this show has gone through this season. It seems like it’s been forever since he was on the show. I don’t really like the Liam/Navid/Silver triangle. Even with a crazy fight at a movie premiere and a possible pregnancy, nothing about this triangle is interesting or fun. I completely forgot about Annie’s foray into prostitution until Annie mentioned it. Also, it is so crazy and stupid that there’s a storyline on this show about a soon-to-be priest sleeping with a former prostitute/hit-and-run driver. That’s just insane. Lastly, I thought the illegal immigrant storyline was kind of random. But then again, isn’t everything on this show kind of random? What did you guys think about tonight’s episode? Leave your TwoCents in the comments below!
When you’re even mildly dehydrated your blood thickens and can’t flow as smoothly. That means your heart has to work harder and your muscles and organs aren’t getting what they need as quickly and efficiently as they should.
When BN politicians resort to gutterism (sic), their fourth estate gets smutty. Sadly, most of the other MSMs catering to the opposition are no different.
Left to right: Icing “tickled pink” O.P.I “lucky lucky lavender” two polishes by Simply Sweet (no names on bottles) and Sinful Colors “cream pink”
The rifle is a Belgian Mauser, Model 1950, one of the last bolt-action Mausers ever produced. This one was made in 1952 and bears the Belgian crown over a letter "B" for King Baudouin, the monarch of Belgium.The letters "ABL" stand for Armee Belge-Belgisch Leger, or "Belgian Army Rifle" in both French and Dutch.
in line at a grocery store, might notice
What in the hell is this woman doing in the middle of the road taking pictures of a dead squirrel!?I gave Pickup Man a friendly little wave as he passed by me and he gave me that really confused smile/wave combo. And if one witness wasn't enough, his buddy driving the tractor/lowboy behind him gave me the funny look too.
2. I filled in some cracks, the drawer handle holes and a swirly design on one of the drawers with wood putty. Then I re-sanded those areas.
The one you've heard about where the terrorists female lawyer demanded that all females be ...bagged.
Her favourite character is Ezra, from 'Dinner at the Homesick Restaurant', which is her favourite book.
This month's Yen has just come out and has an interview that co and I did with Yen's editor Annie Sebel. We met her at Black Star pastries for some yummy sweets and coffee and had a chat about just winning the British Council's Realise Your Dream Award, how we work together, the occasional screaming matches that come with being sisters and how our high school art teacher introduced us to Neil Gaiman's Sandman comics and led us on our path to becoming designers.
Candle gives light
As I am breastfeeding my 4 month old I cannot be as restrictive as I would like to be. For example, I have always wanted to try a juice based detox or to try eating only raw foods for a week. Side note: I went to a raw food restaurant for the first time last week in Toronto called Rawlicious and it was amazing. Yes I have had raw meals before (most salads are, aren’t they?) but never have I had raw Pad Thai “a mix of raw kelp noodles, shredded romaine, carrots, peppers, zucchini noodles mixed in a Thai sauce topped with crumbled cashews and green onions.” (see photo below) YUM! So as I was saying, I would have loved to embark on a more challenging “break” but my inexperience with these sorts of things would most likely result in my not eating enough nutrients, protein and possibly calories to feed myself and my little one with, so I will save those explorations for another time.
It was the best move I have ever had. Jeff's company packed up everything for us, so it was wonderful to not have to haul things around and sweat in the May heat. It was pretty bizarre to have the whole apartment, not packed and then within the next 24 hours, have everything in boxes.
The struggle against nationalism has long since degenerated into a confused campaign against any healthy patriotism, even against the most basic identity of human beings, against their understanding of themselves as peoples and nations. This Europe will not function. We cannot build your house without a foundation. The citizens are the foundation of Europe. Policy must respect the will of human beings instead of trying to implement its own vision, which is in reality only the vision of a small elite.
Despite my vehement desire to stop the proposed bell bay pulp mill the title of this post has NOTHING to do with this issue. On our walk this morning (time machine people…remember the time machine…) we ran into our long suffering neighbours Frank and Adrian who asked us if we had noticed a whopping great tree falling down right on the boundary fence between our place and theirs…our tree obviously…sigh…no, we hadn’t noticed and when we just went up to take a look at the tree it was completely rotten to the core, had a mangled and long dead possum skeleton in one of the knot holes (habitat?!) and someone out there is looking after us because it caused the bare minimum of damage to anything at all. Remember…the possum is skeletal and so departed the earth a long time ago so it can’t be counted as collateral damage. We figure the tree must have fallen down on Saturday when it was incredibly windy and we were out for 4 hours at the progressive garage sale because something that big falling down would have made a rather loud “CRASH!!!”… We can’t use much of it for firewood because it is rotten but we can heap up the logs in the corner of the property to rot down and improve the soils cation exchange (organic matter + topsoil = happy days…) and provide a little pile of habitat on Serendipity Farm although I don’t think that many of our invading hoards feel the need for natural habitat to be honest…they just move on into anything that will fit them. We are starting to feel lucky to have a few feral cats about as they are catching rats and mice that are attracted to the chicken food and this time last year we had to use baits…no such problem now! As I said…there are good points and bad points about everything.
So what will you be doing/ were you doing at 10am today?
I had a fantastic day saying at home and making really yummy things to eat for breakfast, lunch, and dinner. And I also made myself this marionberry pie. I had been saving those berries we picked just for this pie. And it was yummy.
In other good news, I survived the group project presentation in my Library 101 class. Now I just have a final tonight, another one next Monday, and then summer officially begins.
"Traci...be more like William Wilberforce."
And from heavenly sky’s
Paul was not going to be the one to save his people from their sin. Jesus Christ was and is the only Saviour. Nor did Paul know what it would take to convince those of Israel to turn to the Lord. The sovereign Lord knew full well all these things, yes, even the possibilities of the future. He knew what would happen should Paul go against His will and remain in Jerusalem. It would be much the same that was happening here in Acts chapter 22; a full scale riot. He was actually seeking to spare His apostle unnecessary hardship.
Biermann was banned from publishing his poems, and performing his songs, Nina grew up in a household under suspicion by the state security police.
If, on the other hand, I have my iPod on, and I’m listening to a book while the people behind me decide that the song they just downloaded is incredibly cool and the rest of the people in the cabin have to listen to it, too, I can simply turn up the volume of my audiobook and drown out the noise (except when I happen to agree that the song is cool! Then I mentally agree with the person who decided to share and I listen in, which also applies to very loud conversations). (Continued in Part 3)
Well, we have had an unusual spring this year. We've had it all - the hot and the cold days, the beautiful summery evenings and the near freezing temperatures as late as just a few days ago. I don't remember it ever getting that cold so late in the spring, but then again - I have not been around here all that long:)
Things have been so hectic this year that we almost ran out of time to do our annual Ginger Bread Houses. Lily kept reminding us, and we kept promising soon. Finally today was the day. I whipped up some frosting and we went to work with our glue guns. No we aren't crazy, we put Charlotte to bed for a nap before starting anything including hot glue. Lily directed daddy in the basic construction of her house and then set to work decorating it.
Because of such a busy weekend, which included day from hell, I neglected to announce the start of a brand new challenge on Get Funky. The theme this month is Autumn and the hostess is Amanda. Click HERE if you want to check out her gorgeous card.
Keeping in mind that St. Monica has no power to help out except through intercessory prayer, like anyone else who might pray for you, clearly, prayer is something at which Monica really, really excelled.
But here’s the crunch bit –
DPCJ - Dislocated Poppin' Crackin' Joints
Apparently this tool is being trained to catch images that have become barely human, as in almost entirely computerized faces. Check it out: Nina looks the most fake.
To repeat, if you don't like a book then don't read it or give it to your child. However, it is not your place to dictate to others what they and their children may read.
collect postcards at le Louvre
All this time, through the stupid shit that is inevitably part of growing up and keeping on, I had moved forward. Its hard to track age, when it hasn’t really shown up on our faces or in our joints yet, but this has shown me the difference between me, and people in my generation like Sinead. In adversity we can either be victims or survivors. It’s really that simple. Sinead is still in msny ways a teenager, living with her parents, and taking the back seat on life’s major decisions. When something didn’t work out, why should it be her fault? Why should she have to stomach that something she wanted was out of her grasp unless she left her comfortable, climate controlled bubble?
To a bright, azure dome.
Catelynn: "yeah, that's your opinion. I like it."
Killer sandwiches on house-baked bread (God, I love sandwiches), gourmet Oreos, Scharffenberger cookies, crazy-rich brownies, moist muffins. Dee-lish.
worthy of compassion
And I said, very sarcastically, "Well, don't YOU? You're the one buying shoes."
Have you tuned into any community radio programs? If so, tell me about them.
This little darlin' is from Mo Manning's new "Baby Fairies" collection! You can find her HERE in Mo's online store. This card is actually for our sweet granddaughter, Ava, who is being baptized this coming weekend. We'll tuck a Barnes & Noble giftcard inside . . . since Ava LOVES books!! Here's sort of a side view . . .
THEY SAY “HOLD ME THERE,
LUXEMBOURG GARDENS chairs - because they're free.
I had to fiddle with the appropriate thickness for the peeler blade, but once I got everything set correctly it was a little bit fun to use this tool.
The Snappers, Whistlers and Wavers
The tension between object and human movement widens to a consideration of subconscious contradictions, the "double think" of the show's title. This becomes articulate in a word-play sequence in which dancers Kirstie McCracken and Lee Serle throw random nouns at each other, to which the other dancer responds in wilful, even satirical movement. They then reassemble the wall into two distinct halves. A dancer sits on each side and gives the other wildly contradictory instructions on what they "must" do, furiously agreeing with each other. Serle insists on control, McCracken on the lack of it. It seems very clear here that they are representing the different hemispheres of the brain.
P.S. -- Julie and Ann Marie, send us your mailing address by email or twitter; first response gets first pick.
Are there educational programs that can be introduced in our schools?
We were fortunate to have my niece, Elyssa, come spend the night with us this past weekend. She is 11, but Landon is obsessed with her! And I'd be lying if I didn't mention that she's pretty smitten with him, too! To be such a difference in age, they play so well together and she was a really big help keeping Landon occupied while I fed the baby! The night that she spent the night we all had a movie night in the den. We let Landon stay up late, popped popcorn, and cuddled on the couch. I personally enjoyed it so much that I told Josh this must become a weekly activity for us!
A few weeks ago I had one of these meltdowns on my husband. Now normally, my drunk brain knows enough to reach out to someone who knows the extent of the problems I’ve dealt with… usually my poor brother. He’s gotten more than his fair share of drunk texts and calls. But I guess this particular time it was my husband who happened to be there… and I unleashed all my pent-up crazy fury onto his poor, unsuspecting ass.
In any event, if you are interesting in how YOUR state is handling the primary season, a great resource is The Green Papers, which is process-wonk's Nirvana of all the minutiae involved in the primary and caucus process, and gives a ring-side seat to the convoluted and often messy process of democracy. Go take a look.
Someone asked me how I was doing and I replied, “I’m terrified.” And I wasn’t exaggerating! It was scary. But I returned to my boat, got in it, and headed down the river. After a few seconds, there’s no turning back. BUT, the amazing thing was not that I survived, but that I HAD FUN!
Last year we had a barbecue, so we were far from formal,
The First Lady closed by toasting the children as "the real heroes."
So, there were two condoms in my son’s side table drawer for quite a while. And then there was a girl friend. And then there was one condom. That afternoon, I met my son in the driveway and said, “Get in the car. I need to talk to you.” “Why?” he asked. “Get in the car,” I said. “We’ll go get ice cream.” Maybe my Dad is onto something with the driving thing, but a car ride is my go to parenting tactic when I need to confront—I mean—talk to, my son.
P: Everything looks good so we'll get it mailed off for you.
I really liked this movie, except for the dead wife/mommy storyline. I feel like, even though it was based on a true story, this part was overly manipulative. Especially the business at the end. I really am a sucker for father/son bonding movies, and I love animals, and I am one of the few unabashed Patrick Fugit fans out there. Overall, it was a really good movie with a lot of memorable stuff, but I couldn’t rate it higher because I couldn’t help but feel like a bit of a puppet as I walked out.
We have many sexual partners because we have not realized that sex does not make a
10. Harrower says that when you write a feature story, your style can and should be different than your news story style. List at least three style choices he says can be different in a feature story.
Wednesdays Night is Seniors Night – $2 off dinner buffet for age 60 yrs and over (starting at 5pm).
to meet deadlines.
Short stories in this issue are written by Valerie Sirr, Niamh Boyce, Nuala Ni Conchuir, Meg Tuite and Michael J. Whelan, to name a few authors. Liam Duffy, Miceal Kearney, Honor Duff, Noel King, Libby Hart, Alan McMonagle, Clare Sawtell and Mary Melvin Geoghegan have poems included.
Shelly, tonight's featured ring girl, asked me if I was as good a shooter as a pugilist? I smiled and winked. "Sweetheart, on a moonlit night I could spot the wet glare of a rat's fanny as he trolled through the damp gutter."
97 9. “The Daring of Moderation: Student Power and The Melian Dialogue.” School Review, vol. 78, pp. 451-81 (1970)
Over the next few days, our team will share insights from the conference. Today’s highlight comes from Sean DeWitt, Director of our AppLab Indonesia initiative, which is helping to create new technology-based businesses for poor people in Indonesia, in collaboration with Qualcomm’s Wireless Reach initiative™ and Ruma, a local social enterprise.
At any rate, I was recently contacted by an editor who had a close encounter with Ms. Bauer. He's given me permission to quote his letter here in full:
The 4th of July is my favorite Holiday (in the summer). It reminds me of my Daddy!
This past weekend I was able to steal a few JaeLynn free hours. You think I curled up with a good book right? Wrong, I opted for the easy pleasure of television. After popping in the Sex And The City 2 DVD I settled back with the yummy takeout my honey had gotten me and prepared to be entertained. After all I knew today was coming and I simply was not ready to think about anything that had to do with writing. But as with most plans mine got derailed.
I flew out to Orange County on the Wednesday before the show in order to sit in with my boss, Amy, for Crafter's Home. The first full day was AWESOME!! We were treated to a technique tag class with the one and only Tim Holtz! I learned so many new things and got to play with a lot of Ranger's products..something as a scrapbooker, I hadn't taken time for. Now, I can incorporate these techniques into my layouts and mini books! By the end of the day, my fingers were black with ink/stain but it was worth it!
Flash forward to the present and I now watch Sandy and her kids effortlessly pushing files and information to and fro and here and there, from app to app and iPad to laptop and back again, creating new content at a moment’s notice and instantly sharing videos and Pages files with their classmates.
Here I must, again, repeat the warning I have given before. We make a fatal mistake if we only see one enemy amongst the legion closing in around us. Yes there were Zionist Jews amongst them, and there certainly still are some, but they are not alone, and in truth they never have been. We will die by many other swords if chose to only fight against a single foe, especially as there are now far greater dangers than those still posed, or maybe ever posed, by Zion.
They marched upon the organisers and demanded action talking about the guru and the abuse of power.
Just like the one on the left.
1093 ***D-XI/8/1990. “Amendments V, VI, VII, and VIII.” Centennial Lecture Series, Lenoir-Rhyne College, Hickory, North Caroline. (Incorporated in Item B-6, above, pp. 77-91, 411-13 (1995).)
Last night as I sat in the noisome den of our neighbor friends enjoying the honeysuckle breeze curling through the open sliding doors -- the eave of the patio strung with naked bulbs filtering a soft haze over the taco bar and drinks cooler and the lavender light of a super moon playing the consummate tease behind tufts of charcoal lady fingers -- I thought to myself, this is going to be one of the best summers of our lives.
Having said that, I also know it will not be enough to satisfy the truly metric-centric among you, so I will say that there seems to be a general sense that if you can garner 1,000 dedicated followers, that then you begin to have something. (If you Google 1,000 followers you’ll see lots of talk about it, but basically the concept revolves around a committed, dedicated core of true fans, not mutual number-padders.)
Had to pick Joe up from work in the afternoon, took him to Heyford to get a Fast Car magazine .. and then came home about 5 minutes before Mum came home. They had dinner and all that jazz, I didn’t because I figured everyone else would be going out after the evening’s source of entertainment. We were going to a place named ‘Lazer Quest’. For those of you who know places like ‘Lazerzone’ or ‘Zap Attack’ for the realllllly old ones among us .. it’s basically a lazer tag thing with guns and shit .. really good fun.
and my soul shall be healed.
They’ve been ignored with the political establishment choosing to knob-job the banks and lie to you, the public, rather than address the fact that the entire last 30 years have been one gigantic economic scam and that what they were attempting to do could not, as a matter of mathematics, succeed.
It was allergy season, and Lord knows, I had plenty of them.
Agatha McGee is a brash and unapologetic no-nonsense spinster. She’s spent her entire life devoted to her Catholic faith and 46 years teaching her sixth grade students. To the small town of Staggerford, MN, Miss McGee is as much an institution as St. Isadore’s, where she teaches, and even the Church, itself. Everyone seems to have put Agatha in a neat little box, expecting her to retire and take up knitting and bingo.
Although I think of myself as a chick-flick kind of girl, the list is full of action movies, too. Who knew?
That brought you two to light
And he put garrisons in Edom; throughout all Edom put he garrisons, and all they of Edom became David’s servants. And the Lord preserved David whithersoever he went.
His scowl was blacker than ever... A chill went down her back, for he looked like the very devil, sitting there passing judgment on her...then he sounded like it too.
So Azerbaythingamajig won, but the best part of the results portion was when the cutie frontman of the group from Denmark told the representative from The Netherlands he wanted to f*ck her. In English. On live TV.
He peered around the sharp corner into the living room see an unfamiliar face holding a gun to his
“The children. I hear them playing outside. I know they need me. I am all they have in this world.”
The Florida “Stand Your Ground” law essentially allows a person to attack someone (overruling previous supreme court rulings, which declared you should try to flee first) if he or she “reasonably believes it is necessary to do so to prevent death or great bodily harm to himself or herself or another or to prevent the commission of a forcible felony." This is pretty ambiguous language (deliberately), and essentially gives anyone carte blanche to murder anyone in the area, as long as they can show that they were scared for their life. It seems odd that Mr. Zimmerman, larger, older, and carrying a weapon, would be scared of a young man walking through the neighborhood, who showed absolutely no intent on hurting or killing him. Trayvon Martin was responsible for nothing more than WWB (walking while black) in a neighborhood that Mr. Zimmerman felt that he shouldn’t have been in. And now Trayvon Martin is dead, and George Zimmerman walks free (in a new neighborhood – he’s since moved).
I shiver at the thought
Summernats was purported to have drawn a crowd of 85,000 car enthusiasts in 2011. When most people think of Canberra, do you believe the first phrase that comes to mind is “car festival”?
FG=1.018@74F
There’s a Michael Jackson piece (way less impressive than the Axl Rose essay), a piece about Sullivan’s brother’s near-death experience, and a piece about tea party protests during the health care debate. Each has a personal context for the author, and I can’t stress enough how much this adds to his writing. These would have been brilliant essays sans any personal connection, but because he’s found a way to bring himself into his writing, it’s just so much more fulfilling for the reader, and I suspect, for Sullivan too.
The "debunking" of cold fusion, aka LENR, aka quantum fusion, was largely based on scientific fraud committed at MIT in 1989. This is the allegation of the head of MIT's science information office at the time, the late Dr. Eugene Mallove. He alleges this fraud was perpetrated to ensure that MIT continued to receive tens of millions of dollars for its thermonuclear fusion program ("hot fusion"). The report containing this allegation is quite long but the documentation to support the charge is extensive and well worth the read.
Soooo...according to le Parisien, a grim mood prevails in Paris right now. There's been an unhostile takeover by sneaker sporting, map yielding, shopping bag toting, smiling faces & cameras, who are seemingly oblivious to the fact that the city is shut down as tight as a bordello on Sunday. There are expats like myself who are still smiling and happy to be here, no matter what the weather.
How do Jesus’ opponents find an opportunity to arrest Jesus secretly?
Our little brewery had a ribbon cutting ceremony last week, and we
One day, there was a clog that, after an hour(oh how I wish I was speaking in hyperbole, oh how I wish) and was thoroughly exhausted and frustrated, I was ready to call a plumber and ask for professional help. Perhaps a psychiatrist as well, and explain that I’d been yelling at a toilet for the past 45 minutes(I managed to remain calm, cool, and collected for the first 15 minutes) as if it had feelings and was retaining this clog deliberately. Desperate, I turned to the internet. Ah the internet, is there no question you can’t answer?
“I personally wouldn’t ride my bicycle on the streets of Burlington. I wouldn’t feel safe doing that,” he said.
I hope you always forgive and you never regret
Robert Cordice, 28, New York, N.Y.
I can’t continue to ask my body to do things it is not capable of. I have to give it what it needs and take away what it doesn’t. It is silly of me to think that I have the ability to ski and keep up when I have done nothing to ensure that I can. It is ludicrous of me to think that it won’t ruin the time spent together with friends. It is outrageous that I don’t see what’s wrong.
Dear Mr. Sharpe,
I have to stop writing now , but I promise I shall not stop shouting out because I have just started now.
Over the course of 200 pages, each category is carefully examined for solid evidence of Muhammad’s historicity, and each category is found wanting.
I posted this on the same day three years ago. I am pretty level-headed, not one for sap, but I do love Valentine's Day. It allows us to gush, encourages us to romance and ensures we need not make excuses for sentiment.
I forgive myself that I have accepted and allowed myself to limit myself to only a picture that I perceive myself to be
In early January it started up again, but this time, it did not stop.
6: SHIRLEY & LEE - A Little Thing
One of the rarest Bootlegs of Jimi, released in 1989 by Golden Memories. The sound-qualitiy is top. To hear are rehearsals in a Greenwich Village loft with jimi Hendrix, Billy Cox and Buddy Miles.
I stamped then, overstamped without re-inking, which is why you
Oh, and Dr. A asked me how it was that Kinlee was sitting there reading a book while she waited. I told her she was reading at somewhere over a 1st grade level at this point. She didn’t believe it at first. Then she just asked, “How did you DO that?” to which I responded, “Without nearly as much effort as you might think.”
disclaimer : I am, and do not pretend to be an expert on the topic of running and fitness. This is something that I enjoy doing and want to share my experiences with others. The content of this post is based on my personal experiences and not to be taken as professional advice.
So that the maiden can open another
Slotted spoons are so handy. They're like having a mini-strainer at your fingertips. They're great for pulling okra out of the fryer; squeezing buttermilk out of freshly made butter; grabbing that bay leaf from a pot of soup; straining vegetables at the dinner table; and allowing Hubz to drain a little broth off his soup since he thinks it should eat like a meal every time. I have quite an eclectic collection and they each have their own story, which is part of the fun.
I'm looking at IO as the last of the Galilean moons. There is more interesting myth and also some interesting science and possibly more water?!
I'll be back to write for you lovely people next Friday
It's been raining like piss out of Rick Perry's boot for the past half hour.
Lord, I do not want to miss Your miracle for me. You do not want me to miss my miracle.
Well so far there have only been unfounded rumours which at this point in time can’t be substantiated.
Introducing Midamite – the durable, textured emulsion. Midamite is available in fine, medium and coarse varieties. Then there’s Fresco – an acrylic, suede-textured coating, which is the gentler of the two. This unique textured paint offers subtle, graded colour nuances.
Will I do it again next year? I'll have to see where I'm at when the time comes, but I think I would. The challenge was, on the whole, fun.
The execution is kinda sloppy, well that is just my opinion. And I’m not talking about the CGI effects, it’s the flow of the story. The film is nice but it doesn’t have a wow factor. I still think Iron Man is the best comic book film, EVER!
I cried out to God for understanding. I came to live with the understanding that made the best “sense”. Foundational to the theology of Jesus is that human suffering which results from neglect is Not God’s will. Nor is it the result of personal karma. Those children were not the re-incarnations of bad people. They were innocent, but bad people had made choices which resulted in their suffering, both before they were born and after. God’s will was that we carry them in our hearts and minds and that we develop relationships with them.
For example, if the publisher sells the $24.99 hardcover to a distributor at a 40% discount, then you as the author would only be getting 10% of $15.00 (approximately—$24.99 - $9.98 = $15.01).
We made an appointment for this upcoming Monday to sit down and talk about what our next plan of action is!
For more information on the author and The Happiness Project (or to find tools to start your own), visit http://www.happiness-project.com/
So how has my life changed over the last two and a half years? Let’s see – my mother has had two hip replacement surgeries, was diagnosed with rectal cancer, went through chemo and radiation before surgery in which she now has an ostomy. In the middle of it all she was also diagnosed with Lewy Body Dementia. My father had a heart attack and then was diagnosed with atrial fibrillation, yet he is my mother’s primary caregiver. I worry about both of them. I go to their house daily because mom waits for me and becomes anxious if I don’t show up. In the meantime, my husband’s second cousin and her husband (we call them ”aunt and uncle”) who lived in Houston became ill. They both ended up in the hospital and my husband traveled to Houston from our home which is 3 1/2 hours away at least once a week for four months. I joined him at times, but this all happened at the same time my mother was in the middle of her cancer treatment and surgery. His uncle was released from the hospital on February 25, 2011, his aunt passed away the very next day and so now his 93-year old uncle is living with us. He is a very nice fellow but honestly, he is an alcoholic and addicted to pain pills, sneaking and stealing them even though my husband never refuses when he asks for pain medication. He is non-compliant with his meds, taking too many or none at all, at will. He has dismissed the home health care nurses because he didn’t think he needed them. Several of his doctors have dismissed him as a patient, not because his health is so great, but because he refuses to follow their advice. The plan all along has been for him to move into the house that we own across the street from us. My oldest daughter is living there now with her four-year old and she is to be his night-time caregiver. We have a hired caregiver that comes in during the day. That has not yet happened. And to top it off he continues to push to get his driver’s license back.
Lizzy and Joseph come to rely on each other for moral support until the night she is assaulted and disappears. Joseph charges headlong into a clumsy campaign to "rescue" other girls who might also be in danger. He quickly realizes that some people don't want to be "rescued" and that he must change his attitude--and perception of people--if he is going to affect some change in their lives. His search for Lizzy and others, like her, pushes him to become that better man.
I’d love to do some non-fiction picture books – biography, history, science – particularly when the story revolves around a particular person; in essence, is still a character-driven story.
The milk will drain through the bag and the almond pulp will be left behind.
2 tbsp finely chopped spring onion greens
It's 1977, I'm in a cinema. It's such a long time ago that people on one side of the cinema are allowed to smoke while watching the film. We're talking ancient history here folks. I've just watched these giant yellow letters scrolling up the screen and then a spaceship flies over my head being chased by another giant triangular space ship. To my five year old brain this is immediate sensory overload. Up to this point my idea of special effects was Tom Baker running down a wobbly corridor being chased by a monster that was clearly made from the contents of the bin behind the studio. I'm fairly sure my mouth was already hanging open in awe at that point but, little did I know that the best was yet to come.
While covering a story about a taxi-tutoring institute in Jackson heights, I got a new identity. This time it was Moroccan, wow. As I
“Well, come on over here,” her voice smiled. “All of you. Try some. I have some testers here.”
I try to be as open minded as possible, I believe in One God, maker of all things, I believe in the ten; which were asked for by man, which are found with-in the two, those two are: Love the Lord your God with your whole heart soul and mind; followed by Love your fellow man as your self. My life is dedicated to Jesus the Christ the living Son the first born of many as Paul says the first the choices fruit, of the living G-d. so the second and the first have much the same meaning for me; this means: respect of others as much as for your-self . We are here to serve each other- not as slaves, but as family to nurture, care for ,to see that each attains their highest potential. The choices we make determine the life we lead; so the life you have chosen for your self, is bound by those choices. It is said a person can not change, however one can choose to change at any time. This I promise, I may not agree with you ,nor you with me, but you have the right to live as you choose as do I. And I will fight for you to do just that , I will expect the same from you. We all have the right to live free of anger, hate, and rage.
And I screamed, "Oh, God, please don't take my wildchild from me
That brings us to a very big question we need to answer in today’s world. If God is compassionate, and has the ability and the willingness to heal, why aren’t more people healed?
And now my tree is a one of a kind original!
‘If you want to pay more, pay more, they said’.
My food memories from the fair are free biscuits and elephant ears. As you can imagine, the choices were endless - Burgers, pizza, hotdogs, corndogs (even chocolate dipped...ew?), nachos, gyros, sushi (?), roasted corn, Saratoga chips (apparently fresh cut potato chips loaded with chili and cheese), fried candy bars, funnel cakes, fish, chicken strips, cotton candy, etc. There was even a donut burger - Krispie Kreme donuts as the bun with a big ole burger in between - WOW!
This is the single most effective celebration of humanity, death, and loss that I have ever read. And I do mean to link “celebration” and “death.” It’s not morbid or preachy or any of the other bad things it could have been in less insightful hands. It’s a portrait of us and our weird, pointless, gorgeous existence.
Wait a minute, some of you might be thinking – what the hell is Skiffle? It originally started here in the good old U.S.of A. in the early 20th century. It was plain jug /string band music that had acoustic banjo, guitar, fiddle and even a kazoo thrown in at times. Homemade instruments made it affordable to just about anyone, but its popularity waned with the sophistication of Big Bands and commercial pop music. A revival of sorts occurred in British clubs of the mid fifties when jazz musicians took a short break or “Skiffle”, and certain players stayed for an up tempo set of old tunes in the traditional way. Lonnie Donegan became the most famous of these musicians and ultimately had twenty four successive top thirty UK hits. His, and Skiffle’s peak was 1957 when he ruled the airwaves with his no. 1 hit Gamblin’ Man. Such future rock luminaries as John Lennon, Paul McCartney, Van Morrison, Jimmy Page and Ritchie Blackmore (there’s a name The Secret Museum rarely mentions) were hooked on Skiffle at a young age and then spent untold hours banging away on their acoustic guitars. Skiffle was pretty wild for its day, but couldn’t compete with the uninhibited sexual energy and loud electric instruments of Rock and Roll, and like The Maya, mysteriously vanished.
What did I do to my hair? Why did I do this and why didn't someone stop me?
They are very snuggly with us and are total lap-cats in the cold weather, but they took some time out to play with the empty shredder box last night. Inigo has collapsed it with his hugeness. Just before I took this picture, Vizzini was actually inside the box, with Inigo sitting on it. By the time I'd grabbed the camera, he'd flopped on the carpet.
blender pen
While the proposal does not dictate which fuels a plant can burn, it requires any new coal plants to use costly technology to capture and store the emissions underground. Any new coal-fired plants would have to halve carbon dioxide emissions to match those of gas plants.
In fighting I did hurt those dearest to me
3) Grip the card with your thumb and ring finger, and place your index finger on the corner furthest away from your hand.
Another officer came out to ask if I'd been helped yet and I had to explain again and he went off to find the supervisor.
I started Zumba three times a week. Latin Dance workout? You know I love it. (It’s a good substitute for dancing to hip hop at the only decent dance joint in the lakes area.) Three different instructors. Big differences between each of them. One of them makes us do things that make us look like 20-something gangsters and I’m wondering if I manage to get really good at those moves whether my children would be proud or embarrassed.
Catherine’s thoughts: I feel weirdly non-crazy when I rock to this song. I feel like an adult. “But above all this, I wish you love” makes me feel very far along in my healing process. Until I realize, nope, not quite there yet. I will always love you, but I’m not sure I want you happy. At least not until I am. Just sayin’.
Mara sat beside Davis, refusing to turn to him for comfort but not having the strength to turn away. Even side by side, they were miles apart. In the crowd of faces, she was completely, totally alone. Sympathies were offered, hugs shared and tears shed; all of which were lost on her. Everyone else’s hurt paled in comparison to hers. Their soft spoken words were raw and rough on her heart. The hugs were scratchy wool on her skin, and the tears mirrored her own. Grief had filled the room and Mara was left with nothing else.
P.S. I’m certain I just pissed off a lot of my readers. Sorry, I needed to vent. I got into ANOTHER argument with a group of liberal gays that can’t seem to see that there is a bigger picture.
Derek is arrested one night for curtb stomping a young black man who is attempting to steal his late father’s truck. Derek is convicted of voluntarily manslaughter and sent to prison. In prison, he befriends a black0 inmate. Despite some brutal bullying by the white supremacist population, he shuns them for his new friend. He gains a new perspective on life. When he is released, however, he discovers daniel is headed down the same path towards joining the skinheads as he did. Derek determines to stop him.
Our fear: He goes on vacation.
Crimen-injuria complaint against Black SAPS
I have emails from friends from a month ago sitting in my in-bin with EVERY intention to sit down and write them back.
Fear and liberty are consistent: as when a man throweth his goods into the sea for fear the ship should sink, he doth it nevertheless very willingly, and may refuse to do it if he will; it is therefore the action of one that was free: (Thomas Hobbes, Leviathan
Smack some together & VIOLA! Plan on having 3 here when I get done.
One of my Facebook friends sent me this message:
There was a young boy who loved to sing and dance
Yes, that's right, the council as from 1 April are now charging £20 per day (an increase of £16 from the current winter rate of £4 per day) for the privilege of parking in car parking spaces along Madeira Drive.
The shipmen, according to our verse today, knew that they were nearing some shore. It was that “certain island” Paul spoke of in verse 26. They could now see the truth in what apostle had spoken. So what were they trying to prove?
The Milestone Tapes
In a case strikingly similar to Petitioner’s case, the Eighth Circuit concluded that the petitioner’s double jeopardy claim was procedurally barred from federal habeas review. See Wallace v. Lockhart, 12 F.3d 823, 826-27 (1994). In Wallace, the petitioner and a codefendant were convicted in Arkansas state court of felony murder and the underlying felony of kidnapping. Id. at 825. In the codefendant’s petition for post-conviction relief, an Arkansas court overturned her kidnapping conviction as violative of the Double Jeopardy clause of the Fifth Amendment. Id. The petitioner subsequently filed a second petition for post-conviction relief raising the double jeopardy issue. Id. The Arkansas courts, however, refused to overturn the petitioner’s kidnapping conviction because the petitioner had failed to raise his double jeopardy claim until his second state petition for post-conviction relief. Id. The petitioner then sought federal habeas relief claiming, inter alia, that despite the procedural bar, the failure of the federal courts to entertain his petition would result in a fundamental miscarriage of justice. Id. at 826. The Eighth Circuit disagreed, concluding that because the petitioner did not claim factual innocence of the kidnapping offense, he failed to come within the fundamental miscarriage of justice exception. Id. at 827.
What about material sciences and the development of high-tech alloys, ceramics, plastics and glass? Let's not forget so many humbler inventions we take for granted like toothbrushes, razors, waterborne sewers, ballpoint pens and clothes pegs. In the hallowed halls of invention, how can anyone forget the feats of Alexander Bell, Henry Bessemer, Thomas Edison, Blaise Pascal, Nikola Tesla and the Wright brothers, Wilbur and Orville? One can't neglect John Crapper, either!
Qatada is a Jordanian who came to the UK with his family is 1993 and was granted asylum in 1994. He was convicted, in his absence, in 1999 by Jordanian courts for terrorism offences and his extradition was requested. Since 2002 Qatada has been in and out of custody while British authorities have tried to secure his extradition to Jordan. Qatada has, unsurprisingly, fought this extradition tooth and nail. In February 2009 the Law Lords decided that he could be extradited to Jordan. Qatada's lawyers appealed this to the European Court of Human Rights.
photographs
Many new network marketers make these three mistakes and are paying a great deal for their actions. Do everything to avoid making the same mistakes and plan your actions diligently.
A little further west on that top portion of Washington Park, this little enclosure has been put in over the past few years. It hasn’t always been there, but there are still further trails and such down the slope further south and west of this section. In the distance on the left, you can see the tip of Burrows Island, and in the far distance, Lopez Island. A bit further west from here, sometime between ’04 and ’06, I had one of my observances of the festival of the Lion Hunt of Antinous one year.
Historic towns such as Peterborough were changed by vast, bland new housing estates for ex-slum-dwellers. These schemes looked exciting in the plans but in practice were ugly, expensive and inefficient.
And it is applied to shoplifting. So much so that people who grab a soda while shopping, have it in the cart, and miss getting it scanned will be arrested. Even if they have the money and have NO PROBLEM whatsoever paying for it. They admit they missed it. Sure, there may be the occasional person who is trying to get away with something. But on the whole, when someone isn’t going out of their way to hide anything and are happy to take care of it when they see it themselves or when someone says, you missed something, I don’t think they are intentionally trying to steal anything.
Next.
Annoyed as hell.
Id look for all this to happen next week, early the week after that.
with vehemence and distaste
In doing so I have learned a bit about what it takes to be a princess...
And remember, in the words of LB - just don't quit!!
After slight hesitation the children have adjusted to this rule. Now all I have to say is, "I see, and what do you need to do now?" and off they rattle their thanksgivings.
I’m having an email discussion with a friend about who goes to heaven, and so much of what he’s saying is based on a formula, instead of “am I right with God because I’m really right with God and people?”
You're right about the Greek mythology too. Throughout Haywired there are a few nods to Greek history and mythology. If you know your Greek myths, you can even take a stab at the twist with regard to Hephaestus and the HELOTs, which was intentional. I love books that can be understood in different ways depending on what you know. Again, Pratchett is brilliant for this. His books are great fun, but as you get older and learn more, you realise there is so much more going on. I wanted Haywired to have that ability.
So with the advent of the new year (a particularly celebrated year, at that), I'm taking the time to write down the stuff I'd like to see happen. Then I'm writing down how I plan to make it happen. Then I'm writing down when I'm going to get these different pieces of my goals taken care of. And that, my friends, is the secret to my magnificent success.
I'm keeping my eye out for coat racks at thrift shops, antique stores and on Craigslist for our unfinished entry stairwell:
2. Butts in ribs
The problem that is created for the unsuspecting person targeted by evil people involves that person’s own somatic reactivity! What needs to be fully realized is that the somatic reactivity can be instigated at a distance because of the way we respond to our environment and that environment is NOT just the physical environment. The interpersonal environment is a mental place and therefore a much more subtle field of influence.
Spinning around and around and around and around and around,
Chrystopher: Thank you, John. It’s a pleasure. I’ve been writing non-fiction for about twenty years now and teaching writing and communication, in one form or another, for a little longer. I’ve published a number of books on various subjects, two of which have been about Clark Gable. Currently, I’m currently lecturing creative writing at James Cook University here in Queensland, Australia.
Always store them in a good place. Buy a wig head for a wig or keep extensions on a try surface somewhere. I think a good idea might be to hang your extensions up on a hook...but I haven't tried this yet. Basically, don't store them where they can get dirty and nasty xD.
it need some serious caulking!
Compalcomics last auction in March saw Dan Dare and Eagle powered into the stratosphere with £555 pad for The Eagle Club letter and Membership Card, £565 for Dan’s interplanetary figures boxed set by Crescent Toys and £390 for the Horlicks Eagle Rocket Cup and badge.
But there’s another kind of infection--the good kind.
I'm sat looking at them now thinking 'how the hell am I going to peel set chocolate off these flimsy leaves???' - but if it's good enough for Martha Stewart, it's good enough for me.
This chapter is on probability. Yesterday, I created this foldable for my students to use as a reference. They added it to their math notebooks today.
So, here is MY story
Hope you enjoyed the excerpt and that you can't wait to read more! You can get DEAD SEXY from Ellora's Cave at http://www.jasminejade.com/ps-8917-50-dead-sexy.aspx
I should have killed you. I should have acted on my instinct before waking up.
We all know that the "Drinkability" concept/campaign is laughable at best and audience-insulting at worst. All beverages are drinkable. This would be akin to McDonald's starting a campaign proudly trumpeting that their food is "Edible." It's a silly campaign, although not as desperate as their "It's so clear you can't hide its flaws" campaign with The Daily Show's usually amusing Rob Riggle. [Note: I cannot find any of these Riggle-laden commercials anywhere. I'm wondering if Bud realized how insipid and ridiculous they were and removed them from all existence.]
Here are some key points:
I was recently asked by the Fox News Channel (this link is for a different interview for my book, Stories of Faith and Courage from the Revolutionary War) what color Michelle Obama should wear for her speech at the Democratic National Convention. (They asked me, in part, because I’m a historian and author of the book, The Faith of America’s First Ladies). Because I was wearing red, the host asked, “Should she wear red?” I answered she should wear red, white, blue, pink or whatever color looked best on her. She should choose something that looks good on her, that fits her, which will translate to the American people. The same is true for Cindy McCain. Both should wear something that flatters her and expresses her uniqueness.
Zen studios also has an Android/iPad app with select tables for about $2.00 a piece, and it makes for GREAT mobile gaming.
I have been a professional designer of fashion accessories and clothing since 1994, and I have got to get back to my roots---designing! Although the boutique side of Yaya Chique was highly successful, it just was not "for me".
So the film then becomes all about the search for a lost dog. Though Mr. Kasdan uses that to say quite a bit about the different relationships in play in the cabin. The son of Joseph’s sister, Bryan played by Mark Duplass, obviously will hook up with the gypsy played by Ayelet Zurer so that’s three couples to analize. Beth and Joseph try to patch up the things that had made their solid marriage become a bit less happy than it had been in the past. And Richard Jenkins’ Russell, the boyfriend of Joseph’s sister, Penny played by Dianne Wiest, tries to make Bryan realize that he’s a good guy who really does love his mother. And there’s also Sam Shepard as the sheriff.
This has been another installment of:
in fabulous ports
The ANC caucus said it amounted to "a serious onslaught on the freedom of the press and the right for access to information". But why this was so, it did not elaborate upon. And so on and so forth. As far as explanation goes - a reason why the DA's decision was illiberal or untransparent or restricted press freedom - none was forthcoming. That's because there isn't one.
This blog abides by word of mouth marketing standards. We believe in honesty of relationship, opinion and identity. The compensation received may influence the advertising content, topics or posts made in this blog. That content, advertising space or post will be clearly identified as paid or sponsored content.
Holding Term down on the microphone side of things are great guest spots from some of the hottest new talent in the game; Mac Miller, Roc Marciano and Freddie Gibbs blend nicely with iconoclasts Bun B., Havoc of Mobb Deep and Lil Fame of M.O.P and Shawn Stockman from Boyz 2 Men. 2012 has already garnered high praise as this month’s Source Magazine has given the full length it’s coveted “Independent’s Day” column and XXL has a great review ready for it’s May 22nd issue. The duo will also hit the road in both the states and abroad, April – July for full tour support of the album. 2012 will indeed be the year of 1982.
Especially since I'm going to kill every one of you filthy motherfuckers.
We will begin choosing winners through Random Org throughout December 2011. Emails will be sent to those who win regarding these prizes when the time comes.
Times Square: It didn’t matter what time of the day or night, it was packed and full of life, love, and debauchery. I absolutely loved it. We made it on to a billboard. Not to mention the Forever 21 is open until 2am. Need i say more?
I have been catchin up on the blog posts of adult urban fantasy author, Stacia Kane, and her last series of posts (Something in the Water? / Freedom of Speech / I'm Not a Reader) are about authors responding to negative reviews, how people review, and author reviews. The posts actually go a lot deeper than how I've summarised them and say a lot more, but at the very, very basic, that's what they're about. I highly recommend you go and check them out because they're so fascinating and interesting! I just love when authors write posts like this, it's such an eye opener.
Thus the two warring fractions of evangelicals, those affirming and dissenting from Barth’s alleged, fixed distinction between the Word of God and scripture, remained locked into their historical battle positions. Ironically, both camps assumed the same ground while facing off over Barth; they each share a common reading of Barth’s doctrine of the Word of God, accepting Barth’s becoming as the means to understand his conception of being. Into this scrum, Princeton Theological Seminary professor, Bruce McCormack, steps. Pointing out the fact that their common ground is no ground at all, he calls into question the need for war between them.
The first is a Kimono doll with charms and flowers ornamenting her dressed hair. She is made from a selection of new Asian printed quilters cottons, while her obi is silk from a reclaimed vintage kimono. Her kimono is lined with vintage silk.
In coronary artery bypass graft, called bypass surgery, a detour is built around the coronary artery blockage with a healthy leg vein or chest wall artery. The healthy vein or artery then supplies oxygen-rich blood to the heart.
To be faithful requires that I walk with a mirror ever before me and practice constant reflection. When judgments or frustrations arise I often say to myself, "you who have never sinned throw the first stone." I've discovered over time that it ultimately takes less energy to put down the stones than to repeatedly hurl them. It is a greater gift to someone to patiently stand still and be a witness rather than to throw stones toward something or someone I ultimately know little about.
Since 1999, the average Moroccan household have doubled their income. Let us keep up to our Couscous analogy, and assume their couscous share have almost doubled in 10years. This is good news for our average household, since this increase is inflation-free, that is, their increase is in real terms: all components of their couscous share have all doubled by physical measures: pounds of meat, number/pounds of vegetables and pounds of sesame, regardless of monetary value (or price).
On a good day I feel like a heron perched on a rock watching the tweetstream flow by and choosing which is the plumpest, most promising fish to dive for. Conversely on a not-so-good day I feel like I’m in the Matrix, watching ribbons of code wash down the screen, and wonder whether I’m being reprogrammed or reconditioned as it flows in front of my eyes. Then of course there’s the suggestion that Twitter is “crack for the easily distractible” (apologies to whoever tweeted that remark, I didn’t have the wit to favourite it and I'm yet to discover a time-efficient way of swimming upstream to fish it out again.) Whatever one’s view, it is clear that Twitter and other media/ social media/ electronic networks are capable of transforming the way in which humans engage with information, ideas and possibly even with each other – or at least those humans with access to the web who are willing to spend considerable portions of time to splashing about in this virtual paddling pool.
In addition to one of these all-new colossals for every faction, WARMACHINE: Colossals features new warcasters representing the third incarnations of some of the Iron Kingdoms’ most iconic characters, plus fully compiled and updated Unbound rules, providing enhanced gameplay opportunities for large-scale games of 150 points or more.
My beauty is by Rian Designs. Isn't she sassy?
That this manoeuvring is going on behind closed doors is clear by the other strands being played out. The current distraction strand, chiefly which is the bust-up with Iran. Good for distracting the proles as governments do their damnedest to word and re-word new treaties to not look like new treaties, but amendments to existing treaties. Thereby avoiding the triggering of referendums and an outbreak of democracy across the EU. However, the affect of these not-treaties will be a new EU, with a new management in charge.
This has pushed eReader makers to the tablet market. The Nook launched its tablet version earlier this year. The Kindle and Kobo quickly followed. Though they are still catering to the user who mainly uses the device to read, now there are many more capabilities added on. The pricing model is also drastically different from most tablets, which charge high prices for the device and low prices for content (such as music, movies and apps). Analysts believe that Amazon is subsidizing the price of its new Kindle Fire hoping to make its profit from sale of ebooks, as well as fees for its cloud-based content, including streaming video. But outside the US, Amazon has once again shot itself in the foot. Its streaming content is not available outside the US and as of the publishing of this blogpost, the Kindle Fire is nowhere to be found on the Amazon.ca website.
heaven help me
I was warmly received by Celia, half of the Kike Keller duo. She is an amazingly creative woman who doesn’t stop thinking, creating, producing and being surprised by her inspiration. Celia explained to me her love for the hard work, the “upcycling” and the careful selection of pieces.
Fitting very snugly into the palm of your hand, the whole device slips between your labia, sending pretty powerful vibes over your entire clitoral area. You can use it by yourself or during sex, stimulating your clit and labia while your partner penetrates you.
Accessories: crochet lace trim, sheer ruffle edge ribbon, buttons
My amazing and super-talented BFF, Kim (Miss K.) has been there for me for 21yrs despite the zillions of miles separating us now and the ridiculously confusing-still time zone differences… She’s been my rock and my constant in so many ways even when we’ve disagreed about anything the foundation of our friendship has stood steadfast and ready to keep going…
You belong to me.
So...I do feel like I'm waking up to the reality that I have caused this problem and I can solve it. Truly this was not some invisible force making me fat...it was me. Hand to mouth..fist to mouth if it's popcorn and why can't I have ice cream if everyone else is...poor...poor me. I have reaped what I've shown and that means I can do it again...only this time I plan to be happy with what I reap.
I have issues with following all my lists and schedules, the same way I have issues following recipes and instruction manuals. Something inside me freezes up and my mind goes blank. Don’t ask me why. I can read a recipe and think ‘hey, I can make that!’ yet freeze up when the ingredients are in front of me. It’s like some sort of disconnect, a computer hanging, a ‘does not compute’ sign popping up over my head.
Diversity in literature is an important topic that is being actively debated across the publishing industry. Everyone should be able to open up a book and read about a character who looks like them, shares their beliefs and/or life experiences, and who can serve as a role model for their own existence. That same diversity needs to be reflected on the covers of the books, and in the photos of their authors.
The description on the website says it as well as I could:
It's music to me
54. Borat (Sacha Baron Cohen) – The balls in the face scene – perfection.
However, when it comes to mobile banking, the UK is lagging behind with just 27 percent of Brits admitting to using their mobile phone to check their back accounts compared to 52 percent globally. This has surged dramatically since 2008 when the global figure was just under 20 percent.
With trust, compassion, gratitude and love,
During the public hearings, residents will be given a chance to either submit new names or vote when more than one option for a particular place is given.
Ms. Knoxious and I grabbed some grub, listened to Bruce Robinson in the background (WWWD: What would Willie Do?). Then it was off to Jet. I guess we missed their slow crap, because the last 3 songs were pretty rocking. They're kind of a throw back to the second rate bands of the 70's, but it's nice to see a new generation attempting to rock.
So yesterday, my 16-year-old daughter woke up and spent her last morning of summer, her last day before starting her junior year, singing Hinay Mah Tov and even dancing with me under a spreading oak tree at our first IFFP Gathering of the year. Some folks traveled up to an hour to celebrate the start of the year with other interfaith families. This pull, the desire to be with those who fully share our interfaith experience, is strong indeed.
The word CHURCH is found more than 100 times from Acts to Revelation; twice in Matthew 18:17. The Greek word is EKKLESIA. In the Greek translation of the Old Testament Scriptures this word EKKLESIA is used quite frequently and is generally translated “congregation,” as it is in Acts 19:32, Acts 19:39-41, where the Greek word is used to describe an angry, lawless mob of heathen.
Happy Birthday
20 Crocodiles
Apple also doesn't guarantee to accept the books created with iBooks Author--which, as ZDNet's Ed Bott points out, creates another issue:
get it in there, burn it good, slap it on a cracker with chocolate
What a wonderfully therapeutic and rewarding art form.
Austin Pettis 2011 Elite Rookie /999
Luke 5:17-26
As he streaked to and made halt at the castle, glimmered his armour like some old forgotten adage ;
Sandra spat blood on the ground at my feet and yelled at her opponent, "You f****** b****! Don't you ever talk about me that way again! I'll cut your throat!"
Bill: Thank you for the opportunity to share this with you and for keeping a blog for writers. One of the most important things a writer can do is to talk to his or her readers and also talk to other writers. People like you allow that to happen. One way that I talk to writers and readers, other than through my actual writing is through twitter @willangford1, I welcome new followers and will often retweet the good stuff I find among them. Thanks again, Deirdra.
The problem is, I can’t think of a way to do this without sharing specific stories of the kids I have worked with and, even with changing names and identifying information, this is not something I am comfortable with. I am going to try to talk about my experiences in a more general way, hopefully it works this time.
Part of that is that I feel the environment is too generalized to kids with Spina Bifida. When you are pregnant with a child who is diagnosed with Spina Bifida, all the medical professionals are quick to say they can't give you specifics about the prognosis because ever case is so unique. Then you give birth, and now I hear all too often words like, "Well, that's Spina Bifida for you" or "That's so typical of Spina Bifida" when I am looking, instead, for solutions to issues my son, Charlie (the individual), is facing. Because Charlie, while dealing with Spina Bifida as a diagnosis, is not defined by those two words - and really no kid is. But, although every single medical professional who deals with Spina Bifida will say to you that each case is different, those same people are all too quick to write things off as typical.
If you saw my yard, you'd never believe I had enough stuff to fill a vase. You'd be surprised, my friends, what looks good when you cut it and bring it inside.
That very night in Jax’s room a fitness center grew and grew and grew until his ceiling hung with exercise equipment and the walls had mirrors all around and an opportunity tumbled by with a private trainer for Jax.
I had already cleaned the lentils the day before, so I made those (with a little garlic, slab bacon, carrot and onion) and they looked great. The pig feet meat was all warmed up and ready to go, so it was just a matter of plating the dish.
At a press conference yesterday, Gov. Andrew Cuomo declined to comment on whether JCOPE or another investigative body should look into the possibility Senate Deputy Majority Leader Tom Libous improperly used his position to secure a position at a law firm for his son, as a witness in a federal corruption trial in White Plains testified this week. “It is an appropriate area for an attorney general, for JCOPE to comment on. But for me, I don’t think it’s an appropriate area to comment on,” Cuomo said. Cuomo has called for investigations in the past, he admitted, but said that was “mostly when I was the attorney general.” But twice last year, Cuomo made headlines when he called for investigations from then-Inspector General Ellen Biben, first into the Nassau County Crime Lab, and then when he directed Biben to audit the Long Island Power Authority. Cuomo’s spokesman Josh Vlasto said Cuomo could call for those investigations because the Inspector General is under the executive branch’s control, whereas JCOPE is overseen, but not controlled, by his administration. Cuomo, who reportedly has a very good working relationship with Libous, said he didn’t have enough information about the case. “I only know what I’ve seen in the newspaper,” he said.
As for Demand Studios they pay regularly and quickly but I have been struggling with the articles that they want. One of the gems yesterday was Beer Faucet and Shank Assembly. What????
10/04/2012
The company struggled to survive during the two World Wars, then its wines started to gain popularity in Australia during the 1950s, when the country opened its doors to immigrants. Soon, it was one of the largest wineries in Australia.
I placed an order with Fyrinnae on 2.4. and it arrived super fast, on 12.4. I wanted to try a Lip Lustre and bought a few mini eyeshadows and a blush sample also. I have many Fyrinnae eyeshadow already and I have been very pleased with them.
I'll probably have a quick happy new year! post tomorrow, but all in all ... 2010 was a good year. I've experienced love that I've never felt before, experienced friendships I am so grateful for, got to see my sister and discover a side of my country that I absolutely adore, lost my amazing dog and didn't get into teachers college, but tried to make the most of my days.
Bord Bia have designated the upcoming long weekend as the Irish Farmhouse Cheese & Craft Beer Weekend. They've helped organise a whole raft of events all around the country over the next few days, celebrating two things we produce in Ireland which are well worth making a fuss about. A full calendar of events is available on the Bord Bia website here.
Whoa! Are you serious?!
A tapestry is not made in one day. Neither was Rome (I thought I would throw that in…)
Additionally, a child who is obese by the age of 13 has an 80% chance of becoming an obese adult. Current estimates place obesity rates among adolescents between 16-32% and if all these statistics are right, those adolescents stand little chance of beating obesity without some sort of intervention.
Hydrangea
One of my childhood friends liked to come over and play with me on Sundays because she knew my mom would ask her to stay for dinner. We always ate in the dining room and used the china my parents got as wedding gifts. Even for the 80s, it was pretty weird. In a good way.
At all the fuss
When all sin was laid upon him
To do justice to the topic of universal value in art and theory, the author has delved into several areas that impact the visual arts – late twentieth- century debates in art theory models of historiography new definitions of culture and tradition in the context of the individual’s own consciousness or simplest form of awareness. Though comprehensive and detailed it will appeal to those who are curious about trends in the visual arts the advent and impact of new technologies and the development of collective consciousness in our time.
Can you guess what happened next children?
And when you tap on the field, the selection will popup. Note the label “Category” is too long to shown, it truncated, however every item there can be adjusted using CSS, check out the duckumention’s properties of textfield.
- beer- chick peas
When it thickens,switch off and enjoy!!
Join us on Tuesday, May 12 at 8pm at The Coney for our monthly meeting. This month, Tom Lieb will be our guest and will show us how to build picnic cooler mash/lauter tuns and a hot liquor tank.
If you've been fermenting for awhile but would love some fresh inspiration and a variety of new ideas to try...do yourself a favor and get this book!
I have actually read people saying on FB on my own wall that they could not trust a non-Christian with a gun? I have been reading more mudslinging nonsense about religion than actual descent discussions about our situation! Everyone wants to shove their PERSONAL beliefs and PERSONAL interpretations down everyone else's throats. Its more important to them. They could not do a course with a heathen, but strangely enough they were happy when such people died FOR THEM on the border?
We’re getting married in Hilton, where I went to school.
To be honest after writing the post yesterday about my drinking dream I felt a bit better. Later in the day I had the chance to call two of my good good friends in AA and talked about it. Funny one of them I know had shared at a meeting a couple of weeks back he'd had a disturbing drinking dream - it knocked him off his balance too and he is over 20 years sober. It never leaves us, it is an insidious thing gnawing in our heads and hearts - the compulsion to drink may be lifted whilst I work the programme of recovery, I may have the desire to stop drinking but in my head and my heart it stills weedles away trying to find a way to catch me out. Non addicts and alcoholics can never probably fully appreciate that or the feelings associated with it. It was a sharp reminder to me to stay on the right path. "Cunning, baffling, powerful" - Bill W could not have found any other 3 words to better sum it up.
***I lied about the other half being lasers. I'm sorry.
The importance of psycho-history cannot be overemphasized. Practically speaking, many individuals have been raised in non-Catholic families that go back for centuries. When our family roots are deeply defined by a given tradition, it’s arguably difficult to adopt a new set of beliefs. Not impossible, of course. But difficult.
No weapon or injuries were reported in the report.
But the ground has shifted. Max du Preez, a journalist and author wrote: "Nothing anybody says or does can be taken at face value any longer, because we suspect this can only be explained if one understands what the doer or speaker wants to achieve in terms of his or her factional interest.”
duties. I think it’s impossible to gracefully fire someone in that situation. The man had served the university for 60 years. He did a lot of good things and had a wonderful impact on many people. The man’s not perfect (only one was). I doubt this was his only mistake, but it was most likely his most egregious one.
Covariance Complexity
First stop: Zax Pints and Plates. Place was packed. The wife, baby and I worked our way to the bar. Now before I go on let me say a little something about bringing a baby/kid to a bar. I am all for it. Obviously, there are a few caveats. These are mine:
Oh my! A lot of stuff, I like everything from rap to country. One minute you will hear Frank Sinatra, the next Juanes. I love music and it doesn’t matter what kind as long as it is good.
Sang alive
This movie is about risk. And decision-making. And animal nature…our own.
Afterwards we stopped by the theater in the US to listen to Chuck Negron, “formerly of Three Dog Night” (I’m sure there is some lawyer phraseology in the way that was stated)… he sang many of the bands favorites (“Shambala”, “Joy to the World”), and yes, dear Dedicated Readers, I do remember the songs from their original, vinyl versions…
Last night I got off my mopey ass and went to the pub with a bunch of Rich's work buddies. These are all big, bluff, manly men who have been all around the world for many years for work and have seen it all. They've been everywhere and done everything. Tell ya what, there's nothing better for cheering up a mopey gal on her birthday than alot of beer and raunchy tales of the world told by a bunch of rough, tough, cussin' guys. They just good naturedly kept me beered up and treated me like one of the boys. Well, mostly like one of boys. One of the boys with cleavage, maybe. It was fun. Thanks guys. Really.
It’s amazing how quickly dogs improve! Oscar, today, is almost his old self (blind, deaf, often disorientated – but the back end and front end still work well and he generally is still happy with life) – the hole in his foot where the abscess was is awfully large but it will get better with the anti biotics. Panic over!
Anyway...I mentioned in my last post before my holidays that I had been the very lucky recipient of a Craft it Forward gift from the lovelySue at Kraftycupcake. I was so excited to have been chosen to receive one of her awesome needlecases. Im a bit disorganised with needles, and can never find my favourites. So this is just such a brilliant thing for me to get myself sorted out with - and not only is it highly functional, but looks beautiful too
It was getting late and I needed to wake up early for work tomorrow.
Spinach Teton 4.26.12
My age and having a stable job not only qualify, but almost compel me to make "the switch".
I don't know why I speak of these things in such off-handed fashion, almost in jest. I guess it's my pathetic way of acknowledging the very real risks of our existence. Maybe it's my tongue-in-cheek method of trying to appear unfazed by these potential realities. There's a slim chance that deep down, a tiny part of me holds tight to the completely untrue belief that by addressing the dangers out loud, I am warding them away.
"...but being Superman has turned me into an arrogant douchebag. I mean, heck, what can hurt me? Besides red sun radiation, magic, 75 different forms of kryptonite, and that really really nasty rash that Wonder Woman gave me last year during Mardi Gras."
Those are just two extremes in our personality. moreover: those exuberant parties are part of icelandic culture. We are constantly running around drunk. (laughs) Last night we travelled from Paris to Brussels in a double-decker bus, and we had a gigantic party going on. The bus was stuffed to the brim with people and on each floor there was a dj. A world-tour is as exciting or as dull as you allow it to be, or so I believe.
Baking paper
I was wondering about your thoughts on adjusting your price matching "best prices" with the inflation. Specifically, I am finding there are only a handful of okay sales each week in comparison to a cart-ful each week, say two years ago. I've noticed on your blog that your documented fantastic shopping trips are few and far between. I guess what I am wondering is what is your take on price matching with increasing food prices? Have you adjusted your dollar amounts to reflect a great deal given today's inflated prices? When you give out your deals to your subscribers are you finding so few deals, it's not even worth the trip? I am feeling sad every time I shop and walk away with out that feeling of savings like I use to."
But all good things must come to an end.
The problem is, most good writers don't know a lot about guns (there are a few exceptions, like Stephen Hunter for example) ; but a lot of them do write in genres that a lot of "gun people" like to read (military and adventure fiction, science fiction, thrillers and mysteries etc...).
(UPDATED July 10. Working.)
Often wear the same shoe
Shiner Dunkelweizen
on the 21st of July 2012. Best
So afraid; so very, very afraid
Erdinger Weissbräu Erdinger Weissbier Dunkel
2. We send an email with an info sheet & cute images of our
Google’s rivals in the field of patent and trademark publishing complained in writing about the contract. The USPTO then opened the contract to bidding ‐‐ on the condition the service be provided for free. USPTO CIO John Owens continued to push for approval of Google telling company officials in an email in December 2009, “I have quite a bit of pressure to get this deal signed.” Owens didn't explain from where that pressure was coming.
He tilted the bottle up to his lips and drank, then handed the empty to her. She tossed it.
I'm not sure why Big Finish opted to use McCoy and Aldred for this audio. It does not feel very much like a Seventh Doctor story. The difficulty with these 7/Ace audios is doing anything very interesting with them. The New Adventures cornered the market when it came to developing Ace and the Seventh Doctor, leaving Big Finish without anywhere much to go. McCoy is strong on this audio, but Aldred, who was never the most talented actress, is rather lacklustre, especially playing a duplicate. One oddity is that Ace succeeds in making the Daleks think she is the duplicate. The First Doctor failed to do that in The Chase.
I’m so tired of the pigeon holes of life: this or that, us or them, he or she. It is this inevitable quality of humans to desire to categorize everything, to neatly name and shelve every feature and attribute. The truth is that gradients reign supreme, in simple things like colour all the way to things as complex as social interactions.
Black God, White Devil is a film of action and little exposition. It can be difficult to follow at certain times since it doesn’t establish its characters in a traditional way. We frequently see characters introduced in the midst of a greater action. When we first meet Sebastian he is at the center of an impromptu revival among the people of the sertão. For a while, we have a difficult time picking out who the leader is. Only gradually do we realize that Manuel has joined into the celebration.
I have a habit towards the end of the school year to put things off and say to myself “I’ll wait and start in the summer.” The summer always seems to be a perfect time to begin new projects, workouts, hair styles, etc. I complied a list of things that I want to accomplish this summer. For me, making a list and writing this down helps my organize my thoughts and ideas…and helps to to stick to the plan!
India’s economic surge has resulted in a massive increase in the number of private vehicles on its roads, overwhelming the transport infrastructure. Congested roads can be seen as an example of the tragedy of the commons.
Take up your blender and make like a mosh.
I know some of those folks. In fact, I love some of those people.
ALEJANDRA GUZMAN 11/21 9/13/08 @ 12 noon
Lena Adelsohn Liljeroth was invited to open the festivities by performing a clitoridectomy on the cake, which she did by slicing off the part of the cake depicting female genitalia. She then proceeded to feed that part of the cake to a performance artist, done up in blackface, his head protruding through the table.
Also today, Chloe finished reading "Lord of the Flies." Why? For entertainment. Because it's relevant to her life, having been mentioned in a vlog she's been enjoying. Because it's classic fiction that gets mentioned occasionally and she was curious.
TIP: When using the oven to set the powder, be aware that different powders melt at different speeds (for example, metallic powders heat very quickly and cannot be left in the oven for the same time as earthtone powders, without overheating and burning) Also, when using the oven (set it at around 160 Degree's Celsius) it only takes a couple of minutes for the powders to set keep your eye to the tray.
Off to the kitchen to perform my culinary duties next and then a long overdue blog hop!!! Woo hoo!!! What a lovely Sunday treat for me!!
Here’s a compilation of suggestions. The ones that particularly tickled me are listed at the end of this post. The final decisions will be printed in the Fringe Program.
high towers
Jennifer Warnes First we take Manhattan US
I’ve also had several distinctly different series of recurring dreams. One, in fact, that has been going on for years with new “episodes” coming whenever they please. And I’ve had a few of the so called “lucid dreams” as well, where I’ve been able to “direct the action” to a limited extent. And don’t even get me started on the dreams I had when I was in a coma for nearly three weeks.
He agreed with my idea, and, my son was baptised into the Russian Orthodox Church. My mum was thrilled, I got to have the fantastic Godfather I wanted for my son, and Pascal’s Wager was satisfied. (Not for me, I don’t care about a wager I know is moot, but for Mum). He was happy to, again, baptise my daughter when she came along.
Children without Occupations: Forty-two (42) children aged 9 years and under, did not have an occupation listed against their names. The assumption made here is that these children did not start their working lives until age 10 years. Upto that age the children were deemed Wingfield stock – children bred for sale. Then, if the children are not sold in the first 10 year they were given an occupation and put to work in the sugar monoculture Table 1 below shows the number of children against their number in the Wingfield population. For example at age 1 year there are 8 children; at age 2 years the number decreases
It is Farscape’s focus on people, on understanding their behaviours and attitudes on an individual level (even in a large group), and valuing their feedback, that makes our delegates so open and willing to develop. If you aim to understand people on an emotional level and provide them the opportunity to give their opinions, they will be much more receptive. It is something I feel had always been missing from my past experiences of team building, yet it is something that is so essential for development.
I love your bedroom Heather! Romantic, whimsical, with just the perfect touch of color!
So, I haven't been to writing events recently, wanting to avoid some of the charade about it. I dislike the way someone reads and people say great, wonderful, loved it, whether they mean it or not. I hate the way sometimes, people who know me, don't say hello or even acknowledge they even met me before. And I hate the way at these events some of the interaction is on such a superficial level.
The feeble attempts of Darwinian anti-science to prove a chain of development from the lowest forms of life to the highest is seriously flawed by its materialist cult-like philosophy. The progress they seek from the lowest animated matter to the highest form of life is full of gaps and gaffs. Missing links are hailed for their discovery and quietly forgotten when proved false. Darwinian pseudo-science continues in its duplicity, however, despite the facts and its critics. It is a futile attempt to portray man as ascending by his own nature to the throne of God. “For although they knew God, they did not honor him as God or give thanks to him, but they became futile in their thinking, and their foolish hearts were darkened.” (Romans 1:21 ESV)
d) could lyrically relate to your life…possibly
So as you can imagine, with that little lot going on I’ve not felt much like crafting so haven’t really done very much at all since I was last here.
too long; a subject
Thank heavens it no longer looks like this! New floor is in, new vanity/sink is in, toilet is back where it belongs...there is still lots to do but at least it is functional.
“My major in college was Korean and I stayed in Korea for half a year. Last semester, I was an exchange student in Salzburg, Austria. All these experiences make me more open-minded and vigorous. Although due to laziness I’m not a very sufficient player, I learned piano from the age of 5 and I enjoy it very much.”
I have the honor and am delighted to present to you all my very first "non-paying" customers' photos!! I have only being offering free printables for a little over a month and am overwhelmed at how many responses I have received!
The crowd is too many chefs in the fucking kitchen.
The low fat diet so often prescribed by medical professionals and nutrition experts has caused a critical deficiency of healthy fats necessary for the development of the human brain from infancy to adulthood. In addition to the extensive library of research showing the effectiveness of Omega-3 fats in cardiovascular health and cognition, new evidence documents the need for this essential nutrient through all stages of life to improve self-esteem and to prevent depression. Health-minded people will want to supplement with 2.5 grams of combined EPA/DHA to naturally protect against behavior disorders and depression.
~ Julie came home last Friday and told me "Happy Veterinarians Day, Mommy!" and then proceeded to tell me all the ways they had celebrated and studied veterinarians that day at school. The one part she couldn't figure was why they honored this little girl whose entire family had been in the Army. What did that have to do with Veterinarians Day?!
This “Connor” rug from Pottery Barn Kids circa 2003 was the jumping off point for the colors in the room. I love its palette of dark and light blue, sage, and red. Cheerful for a child’s room, but not too juvenile and cutesy.
Most of the comedy in the season was driven by Spike and Angel bickering, this was a nice vehicle for them to start trading blows as well.
But when I got to the BrewDog page I was so incensed by their comments I actually chucked the book down in disgust.
Marc Faber: People say the price of gold is in a bubble stage and it is up substantially from the lows in 1999, which was, at the time, around $252 per ounce. But at the same time, we had an explosion of debt, not just government debt, but private sector debt, and an explosion of unfunded liabilities such as in the pension fund industry, and not just with Medicare, Social Security and Medicaid.
Like I stated last Friday, B just found out his MOS, so of course, with a new job comes new gear and gadgets on his need/want list. Needless to say, B was a little jealous of the Giveaway.
Our stairs are not carpeted.
Don't get me wrong. As a published author, I am the last person to begrudge my publisher's bottom line. That said, as a reading consumer, I want to enjoy the benefits of the e-book platform at a reasonable (whatever that means) cost. Finding that balance remains an elusive goal. Something tells me that this so-called "agency pricing" model will not be the last word on the topic.
We headed back to the hotel to get ready for Guangzhou. We did some laundry in the tub :), packed up as much as we could and then headed to meet 2 other families for dinner. It was so nice to have families around to just talk and laugh with.
I like a lot of pretty pretentious music, admittedly. But a little straightforwardness goes a long way. Which is why, amidst an otherwise so-so dream pop record, NPL drop this total crusher of a piano-based love song. The chorus is just "I love you/I love you/Truly, madly deeply." What more is there to say? Can't wait until I can play this for someone special. I hope maybe you can.
Movement: HOLY FLUTTERS!! wow, Im feeling it this past week!
We save a lot of stuff (Kirby, Streiber, AAT) for future podcasts because I really wanted to talk about three main issues. First, what's a guy with the serious credentials that Jeff's got doing in our sandbox. Second, what the hell is this stuff we puzzle over and where does it come from. And yes, we did cover Jenny O'Connor and The Nine-- Jeff's thoughts may surprise you.
M: That's a pretty low bar.
Nope. Not an option.
14. Season the sauce, to taste, with salt and pepper.
and my blood
Abby moved from despair to anger. She started throwing things off the counter and angerily saying, "but I WANT doggy back! I do!"
I've a feeling in my soul,
As the lamb is being prepped, we prop up the bar and settle into a couple of cocktails. I'm all over the Freda's Bloody Mary which has a sucker punch of chilli and pepper with every mouthful. The boys behind the bar take their cocktails seriously here, mixing up pepper and celery seed infused vodka with worchester sauce, lemon juice, pink salt, tomato juice, tabasco, green olive and pickled chilli. The green olive and cherry tomato speared on a skewer makes a pleasant change from the usual celery stalk.
WACAP has frequently told adoptive families concerned with hearing such stories from their children that kids often fantasize about their birth families, supposedly unable to understand why they were "abandoned". But Luoyang's recruitment program was witnessed first-hand by Michael Melsi, a twenty-something American who started volunteering in the Luoyang orphanage in 2006 as an English language instructor. Michael spent most of his time in the Luoyang orphanage on the fourth and six floors of the orphanage, among the teenagers in Luoyang's "Special Focus" program. There, he befriended most of the children waiting to be adopted from the waiting child lists of WACAP, CCAI, and other agencies.
If they are employed in a corporate company, it follows that they should steer clear from sneakers, oversized t shirts and tacky accessories. They should stick to tailored suit pants, shirts and jackets. Plaid or striped shirts never go out of style. Men can also wear shirts with plain solid colours and spice up their look by wearing a nice belt.
On numerous occasions in the past, I've considered purchasing mail order dissection kits to supplement biology lessons, like those from Young Scientist.
Heddon-on-the-Wall was brought to the attention of the nation when it was revealed in February, 2001 that the 2001 outbreak of Foot-and-mouth disease originated from a farm in the village. This severely affected Heddon-on-the-Wall's primary industry which is agriculture. Over the years however other industries have existed in Heddon on the Wall. These include salmon fishing in the River Tyne, coal mining, the quarrying of sandstone and limestone and brick making. A number of blacksmiths were in the village until recent times. One still exists and is employed in engineering. In the seventies there was a perfumery manufacturing business and recently a brewery.
only hip-hop artist I know...!)
How often in our own lives do we miss an opportunity because we don’t realize our perspective is limited and we choose not to trust in the whole? Accepting and surrendering to the fact that our vision and perspective is limited allows us to trust in the Whole. It also humbles us. If you trust that the Universe is good and that this energy is always trying to help you then you can always trust that even when something doesn’t look good on the surface, it actually is good. The Universe is ALWAYS supporting you and ALWAYS trying to align you with the whole. Our small minds cannot see the entire picture. But just because we don’t see the whole picture doesn’t mean that we shouldn’t trust in the bigger picture. There is a bigger picture even though we may not be aware of it. Trust is everything.
I remember it
History & Geography: Story of the World 1
Since a family can't live on cupcakes alone, I decided a "real" cookbook would be good to work my way through at the same time I'm working through the cupcake book. I chose "The Deen Bros. Take it Easy", a book that promises quick and affordable meals. As a full time work outside the home mom helping to raise two little ones, quick and affordable are essential!
I went to bed
That's quite disturbing. You feel like a totally different person.
What I’m going to do next is propose a series of “improvement” on a system for detecting these variations, pointing out the benefits and pitfalls, ultimately culminating in a setup for Schlieren imaging. Our starting point will be with the shimmering hot air over a candle flame.
Introduction by: J. P. M. Brenan & Anthony Huxley
squeeze fresh lemon
But I didn't buy any of them. Instead I found some lovely vintage items to take home to our cottage.
The earth bounds trapped on the planet are getting restless and you may be experiencing more disturbances within your homes or sensing them out and about. Send a prayer to ask them to be guided to where they can get help.
Let us condense the argument to a single point here. The long string of torture-murders carried out in the 1970s by the UVF unit that came to be known as the Shankill Butchers was arguably the single most appalling episode in the Troubles. The murders were particularly disturbing in that most of them were finished off with the application of a razor-sharp butcher’s knife to the throat of the victim, cutting through the neck all the way down to the spinal column. These murders were committed by what was, in effect, a UVF franchise led by a psychopath who had already demonstrated that the UVF leadership could not control him, and who was content to act without regard for UVF policy and without the knowledge of the UVF leadership.
Which is the way my cat works. Most of the time she's engrossed in her own world. There's stuff to look at, food to eat, naps to take. Washing. Grooming. Exploring. But once a day, she makes it perfectly clear that we need to be affectionate. She'll jump on my desk and sit on the keyboard. Or she'll climb onto my lap. That's the point at which I have to - I must - stop everything and focus completely on her. A petting session or a few minutes of brushing is enough...physical contact to reconnect with each other before we get on with everything else.
How often one hears a particular candidate on the radio is in direct proportion to: how irritating their little jingle is, how much money they have in their political war chest, or how far their views are from one’s own. I haven’t turned the on radio in days. When one expects to hear a harmless number from Tchaikovsky or Copeland, and ends up with hot air instead (and not from the horn section), lips are pursed, teeth are ground, and radios are flipped off. I’ve even taken to muttering.
I also wanted to show y'all this scarf video that I just love.
There’s only one small problem….
After dinner Joe dropped me off by my car at Mom and Dad's house, and I went inside to recount the afternoon, especially the movie. I think my folks would enjoy it very much. Mom loves birds, and Dad loves humor. (Jack Black... Steve Martin-- what's not to love?) I enjoyed spending the day with my favorite ex-boyfriend, in addition to receiving close to a hundred Happy Birthday posts on Facebook.
I’m aiming for one hour a day, every single day.
The pressure seemed to start subsiding at the end of my work day. It's not completely gone but, on the ride home, I thought about how what I experienced today was just a more intense version of what I seem to have been experiencing for a week or so - only in the afternoons at work, if I recall correctly.
Like BO, Manson promised “hope” and “change,” and like BO, he demanded unswerving loyalty and mindless devotion from his minions. We’ve seen the seeds of BO’s “helter skelter” labors in the unbelievably unethical and truly slanderous NBC “editing error” of the Zimmerman 911 tapes, in the race-baiting lunacy of the organized leftists’ race complex, in the New Black Panthers’ bounty on Zimmerman‘s head, in the comments of the president as he inserted himself (yet again) into a local issue that had nothing to do with the presidency, and in countless other leftist attempts to create from thin air a powder keg of racial unrest and violence.
The rise in inventories and even bigger jump in sales pushed the inventory to sales ratio down to 1.13 in March. That means it would take 1.13 months to deplete existing stocks at the March sales pace. The ratio had been at 1.16 in February and stood at 1.39 in March 2009.
There is a game here at this house called the 'Honey Game'. It is really just an imaginary game of house not unlike any that get played in many houses around the world. Ours is named 'Honey Game' because my girls got it in their heads that couples that are married call each other 'honey'.
Sometimes I wonder if its just me, or are all home ed groups full of horrid people? I would like to be more sociable, but apart from the two or three people I have met and liked during our home ed years, all the others have either been horrid or just plain odd!
Spend fall quarter at Friday Harbor Labs, UW’s Marine Station on San Juan Island (FHL). FHL takes UW students from across disciplines and is now encouraging freshmen and sophomores through post-bacs to apply for their undergraduate programs.
So we have these rituals and these rules (these Spiritual disciplines).
This guy was one of my favorites. Here he is getting dropped off by his mom, who paid and assessed the situation then left him to do his thang. Look how timid he is here! I saw him with his posse a few hours later and he was the king of swagger.
This proposal is so contrary to the current paradigm, that die-hard materialists easily ridicule and dismiss it. But we should not forget the bishops of Galileo’s time who refused to look through his telescope because they knew his discovery was impossible.
To finish off this post, some coffee quotes I like:
We also made an effort to have period food. We had a chicken galantine, fruit, pickled carrots and green beans and I made a peach pudding from Mrs. Randolph's cook book from 18th century Williamsburg, Virginia.
In the same month, women were also shocked by the sentence given to Turkish man, Emmin Baro who subjected 50 Ugandan young girls to oral sex and recorded them on videos. He was initially charged with child pornography and given a light sentence in form of 6 million shillings fine
Hi Crafters
So, that being on its way, I am going to be going into North Idaho College on Tuesday to take my COMPASS test and see what my next step is. I think it’s going to be waiting to hear about my test results and then meeting with an advisor. HOPEFULLY an advisor can help me nail down the courses I need to take in the next 1.5-2 years so I can achieve my AA and move on to a bigger university. Hopefully there will be classes open, and available for me to be in. I really really want to be able to take 14+ credits each semester, actually I’d really like to take 20 or more but we’ll see how many openings there are. If it’s not available for this Spring semester, you can be damn sure I am registering quickstyle for the rest and getting as many credits as possible. I want to get the ball rolling. I know I am doing this for Ronan, for Maya, for the children of the future. The ball has been rolling so fast with Rockstar Ronan and all that Maya is doing, I KNOW the ball will roll just as fast on the things I am doing. I am following this crazy destiny of mine, and I can actually see where I will be when I am finished with school. When I have my degree, I can see myself in hospitals, helping children. I can see myself in front of crowds, raising money for foundations, for research, for what’s important. I can actually see it. Like I am watching a movie. I KNOW it’s going to happen. And knowing that, damn, it’s so exciting. It’s exhilarating. It’s like extra life gets breathed into me.
And another BUT. It’s also the place I lived in before I met Alex. The place I’ve lived in for most of my life.
SWOOSH...CRACK! GO! GO! GO!
Shall we take that starship – our own systemic Merkabah – and ascend? It’s up to us now.
In that rush, the nurses shouted, “Is there a relative to accompany her to Mubende hospital?” There was no response. She was incensed and murmured to herself. “This is unseriousness; you cannot bring a pregnant mother to hospital and just abandoned her like this.”
7. A church family is important – Visits to the hospital, picking up our older daughters at school, meals when we just get back from the hospital, and prayers have marked how our church has supported, assisted, and encouraged us. I couldn’t imagine going through all of this without the support of friends, family, and church.
Still, Kony’s a bad guy, and he’s been around a while. Which is why the US has been involved in stopping him for years. U.S. Africa Command (AFRICOM) has sent multiple missions to capture or kill Kony over the years. And they’ve failed time and time again, each provoking a ferocious response and increased retaliative slaughter. The issue with taking out a man who uses a child army is that his bodyguards are children. Any effort to capture or kill him will almost certainly result in many children’s deaths, an impact that needs to be minimized as much as possible. Each attempt brings more retaliation. And yet Invisible Children funds this military intervention. Kony has been involved in peace talks in the past, which have fallen through. But Invisible Children is now focusing on military intervention.
“Am I my brother’s keeper?” You can almost hear the traditional complaints.
Whilst this may suit some - and all power to the guys running it - I think I'm developing my simple idea of what makes a good pub. It's so simple, yet seemingly hard to find:
SUNDAY NIGHT SALE $85.00
So as I said in my previous post I've been making cards for the people I work with and this is the 2nd one I made over the weekend.
I came in and entered in the code so the doors would not set off the alarm.
The blooms are crimson with darker petals on the outer edge and lighter ones inside. The size is rather small, usually no more than 3" in diameter. The fragrance is a light, but noticeably sweet one that is very pleasant.
This is what the White Labs pitchable stuff looks like, that said, this is not as sent to me originally, it is harvested lager yeast from the brew I did, I just reused the container to keep it, it has been washed with water as described in the post I linked to on HBT.
“He kept giving us dirty looks,” the mom said to me as we walked around the dog park together this morning. “I didn’t mean to be late—it was only a few minutes.”
Now you can say that I've grown bitter but of this you may be sure
If you play a drinking game with a ping pong ball, and you try to bounce the ball into a cup of alcohol for the other person to drink and you are outside bouncing the ball off the ground, but you have a cup of water to wash the ball off with, and you don't care about the cleanliness of the ball going into the drink because you will be too smashed to care....why? And is that really fun? Wouldn't a game of dice (sans the alcohol) be more fun?
Not the same as the Chanter Sisters' Sideshow, let's say that first off, but a loping reggae cover of Blue Magic's US hit by Biggs, who for his big showcase has chosen an all pink version of the sort of ruffed outfit being exhibited over on ITV's The Comedians, albeit they'd have other reference points for all pink suits. Must be said, while the organ solo isn't exactly Ansell Collins the orchestra give reggae a better going than they gave Althea & Donna just over a year later, but Biggs without the record's production effects is just a large man with a receding afro and huge bow tie pacing back and forth singing in awkward falsetto. Halfway through, as it's Christmas, the director lets the cameraman plough right through the thick of the audience just like he used to, mowing at least six people down on his way. "Congratulations to Barry" Noel says afterwards for no good reason. It's his job to sing like that.
Thankfully I have some awesome neighbors, who just so happen to have a whole "woodshop" in their garage. And he's a carpenter. So while I'd love to say I did this ALL on my own with absolutely no help, I cannot. He helped a LOT. This is probably why I still have possession of all of my fingers. I can confidently say that I DID build it, but it would definitely not be as sturdy, and would have taken a lot longer for me to work out the tweaks had I not had such an awesome resource right there with me. :) (Thanks again!) All in all, it took 2 weekends to get the lumber, cut, build, sand, paint, and assemble. Not too bad when you think about it! And the cost total was only about $160 with everything. That's $100 less than what I would have paid for the cheapest bed I found! Plus, this one is going to be way more sturdy (it's a heavy beast!), and the design and color that I actually want.
The veteran, who started the day in a share of 29th place, had two bogeys and five birdies on the front nine and was flawless the rest of the way, making birdies at the 15th and 16th to move to five-under.
“Thanks, Jeremy. Wow . . . that’s an interesting plant.”
It looks like on the box there can be 6 or 7 little ones.
My best friend from high school and I conspired on the telephone tonight to skip out of the planned activities on Friday night (that is, attending a football game) and to go out drinking. Which was, of course, exactly what we did in high school.
– Ye reckon these then, man?
Last but not least, my dad inked over the original pencils. Since I was home, it was easy enough to hand it over, assembly line style. I ended up creating the borders digitally and doing minor edits. I quickly learned that my pencils needed to be tighter, since he couldn't always tell what I was thinking. For instance, in the bottom, right-hand corner, I had intended the tree to be in the foreground, not touching the wall. Like I said, minor edits.
Each view has a Help-style description with a short 1 min video overview in it. This goes to show that seeing these views in narrated action is much more intuitive and easier to understand than just reading about them. It’s literally leveraging some “show & tell”. The best way to explore these views is to download the free Roambi Viewer apps on the iPad and play with them. They come with stored sample data sets so you can visually explore the views even while you are offline. Roambi also features brief videos and tutorials on their website.
Secondly let me go on record to apologize for the lack of pics and the ones I do have aren't that great. But without further ado, here we go.
By the time I put a soggy little puppy back in his cage and made my way to where the screams were originating from it was too late. It was a massacre.
At her husband, she shoves the tub of hummus and shrieks, "Did you do this?"
She really didn't want to see this happen. At the time, I couldn't understand, and I spoke to her harshly, and I forgot myself, sober mind you. Sober, but completely intoxicated with ancient twisted karma, tangling me up into ideas of who I think I am and where I come from, and very silly shit like that.
Butter: to brush on rolls once the baking is sompleted
Oh, sorry Fred. If Frank had only known to factor in the illegal, conspiracy to suppress the votes of non-Conservative voters in his calculations, he would have been able to predict what happened instead? The irony is, Frank was right. He predicted a future that we’ll never know in this dimension, thanks to the success of illegal, vote suppressing robocalls.
Another popular set of headstones at Hillcrest is that of Mammy, the 94 year old nanny of the prominent Coxe Family. She is buried in the family plot in a place of honor with the family she so lovingly cared for. Her tombstone inscription reads " Mammy, Faithful Unto Death"
Wild mahi mahi filets, $2.97/lb. at Newflower (through 12/22/10)
- "Go to my website for a sample of my work…"
Becoming “Awake” is a valuable lifelong asset that can be used in life, both business and personal.
That on the touching of her lips I may
C: Exactly. If it had said “stuff racist people do” or “stuff racist people say”, okay, I could understand that. But stuff white people do? That’s racist towards white people, and not just society as a whole. Because everyone is racist on some level, why should whites be targeted any more than Asians or Africans? Being of a certain ethnic background doesn’t make you racist. It’s a human condition. The blog link doesn’t reflect that, so no, I’m not going to check it out.
It's been a crazy week so far... Meri's hedgehog died yesterday. I take that back... It must have been Monday night. I FOUND her on Tuesday morning. Meri buried her in my flower bed in the front landscaping. She and Ryan were pretty broken up. They'd enjoyed this one since it's birth 2.5 years ago.
Just be yourself. That’s all I’ve ever done. It has never been my goal to fit in anywhere and I’ve always been a bit of an outsider everywhere. Which is just fine with me.
I asked him for the latest news
Has fallen short or been turned aside.
It’s not easy being the smart, fat kid. Being badly dressed doesn’t help either.
night is becoming day
So what do you think? Does it sound difficult or bizarre?
After a hot shower and some mouth wash I was good to go. I scarfed down a quick bagel for breakfast and hopped in my car at around 9am. Of course the drive wasn’t as long as I anticipated and I arrived to the Seaport World Trade Center in Boston at around 9:15am. Having 45 minutes to kill I wandered around checking out the local restaurants, piers and the Dunkin Donuts next to the venue. A coffee was needed and definitely deserved after a tough night before, an early morning and a long day ahead.
My daughter quickly made a new best friend today!
If I caught your eye across the room at a Christmas party, would you look away shyly, or meet my smile?
Whether raised by cynical leftist or ardent libertarian, the Constitutional case against the legislation is weak. As an example, if a State should elect to allow slavery or indentured servitude, even the most ardent Federalist should admit that here is an instance where Federal intervention is constitutionally permitted. No State can violate rights guaranteed by the Bill of Rights or the 14th Amendment.
To that end, we would like to raise $1000 for Project Hopeful as they continue to spread the truth about HIV and adoption. Would you please consider partnering with us by contributing to this worthwhile cause?
This year was better . We have a covered radio flyer wagon for him now , and he was cruising around in it all afternoon. He loves that thing . We couldn’t get him to come out . We bought it to have something for him to ride in when we go to amusement parks and things. I hope he’ll come out of it to ride rides and stuff! We had a lovely moment under a tree when he pooped and I had to lay him down in the wagon and change him. Oh how I love diaper changes out in fields and parks , they always go over so well . I won’t tell you everything I ate yesterday , because it was not at all healthy . Alright , no secrets . It was free food , you can’t blame me too much . We had pizza and hot dogs and baked beans and soda. All that good healthy stuff to give you the energy you need to walk several miles. I did better with the walk itself this year. Aaron was content to be pulled in the wagon and we walked a mile and a half . Which for me is pretty good . No shin splints this time ! yay!!! It was my upper legs that were feeling the burn this time for some reason. Had it been cooler , I probably would have tried to go further , but the heat was just too much. It was the first time ,for the season, that I had really been out in the sun and heat , and I couldn’t hack it . I have a red face as a souvenir though. Which would have been ten times worse if I had gone for the full three miles. But it was really nice to get out as a family and do something in support of a cause . I didn’t raise any money because fo some reason , no one likes to sponsor me , but it was still nice to be there for support.
What emotions did you experience this week?
Don’t just read the Scriptures to see Christ, for He is also the Word spoken by the brothers and sisters in Christ.
The Citadel finally won a league game last week, beating Samford 73-62 at McAlister Field House. It was also the first league home game for the Bulldogs, and I am hopeful that the team can add to the victory total this week. Prior to the win over Samford, it had been very tough sledding, as The Citadel had lost its previous ten games against D-1 competition, all but one by double digits.
It's not us who take the dog for a walk, but the dog who takes us out!!
After catching up and discussing our glamorous busy lives, we decided to venture around the Hill for some entertainment as we waited for Sarah to get out of her LSAT class and my bestie, Robert to arrive. We went to Cha Cha's around 5 pmish... yeah, it was definitely a very different vibe from the late night-large crowd happenings. It was totes hipsterville there... you just needed some over-sized glasses, a tweed blazer and a fedora to fit right in with the crowd.
Where Im Ali sews dresses for customers
7. Leave enough time between the arrival date and the wedding. Most gowns can take 4 months to arrive. Most shops ask for 6 months from order date to wedding date. This is not because we’re meanies, this is to stop you getting stressed. Remember you will need fittings once the dress has arrived (and the seamstresses have more than just your gown to alter), remember there are forces outside of our control to contend with. Have you ever seen a bride who left ordering right up until the last point whose dress is now late? I have, it’s a scary sight, don’t be that sight.
I don't know how you do it.
“So many people voted for change and it hasn’t happened. They feel let down. The reason is that David Cameron’s change project for his party was skin deep.
Now before I go on, to help you fully grasp the hilarity of the scene I am about to describe to you, I must backtrack for a moment to another Cracker Barrel outing just over four years ago, one so very antonymous (yes, I just looked up ‘different’ in the thesaurus) from this day.
Sophie was just a baby in a basket. She would sleep in a little sitting room, oblivious to the celebrations going on in the grand dining room. And then as she grew up, Peter would set a little table just for her in her private sitting room.. she grew older and helped Peter in the kitchen.
I'll tell ya hwhy! I can't find the 7 other cards. That's right, I have misplaced Jones-Drew, Urlacher, Greg Olsen, Eddie Royal, Vern Davis, Vincent Jackson, and Rolando McClain.
Until it wasn’t.
Silbergeld EK. Lead in bone: implications for toxicology during pregnancy and lactation. Environ Health Perspect 1991; 91: 63-70.
He never could understand why;
The great warriors did not attack!
Lee Gak recites a verse and looks at his wife for a reply. Unable to give a reply, Hwa Yong reluctantly looks at Bu Yong who was able to give a witty reply. Lee Gak is impressed with his sister-in-law’s reply and they exchange poetic verses. Sweet!
what does he say?
In searching my past beers, I see I've already had one from the Philippines, which surprises the hell out of me.
But there is also a more selfish reason. Laurie is a damn fine writer and I'm fascinated by how she tells a story.
I was recently in a pub next to a group of drinkers, one of whom went to the bar and returned with a round of drinks, including a pint of bitter for his companion with a head at least one and a quarter inches deep. “I asked for a pint, not a half,” the guy said. “Well, take it back to the bar for a top-up,” the other replied. He pondered this for a moment and said “You know, I really can’t be bothered.” Now, in this particular pub, if he had left the pint on the bar it would almost certainly have been topped up by the bar staff without asking, so in a sense he only had himself to blame. But this clearly illustrates that the problem of short measures in pubs is still very much with us.
Rubber gloves will help you deep clean without drying out your hands, exposing them to harsh chemicals, or burning them in hot water.
Wendie is a cheerleader for gardening and the disabled– and like the rain and sun, she is an irresistible force of nature. My $100 today goes to Wendie, Arthur and all their friends. Keep on growing!
I've been allowed home today but must report back on Wednesday for further X-Rays to check its not collapsed any further.
In a year, I’d planned to be in an amazingly better position. I’m not sure what I thought that position was; maybe it was a new guy I was living with, maybe it was a condo I purchased, maybe it was living in a tent in Costa Rica. I don’t know. I just didn’t picture a year later, a year older, resigning a lease for the same one-bedroom apartment.
Today we went to an open house. It’s a house I’ve admired for years, and when it went up for sale last summer/fall, I was interested as the layout seemed decent. So the 3 babes and I went to check it out. It was past their naptime, so I was thinking that there was potential for disaster. Plus, this particular realtor struck me as someone who would not at all be patient with crazy kids, or kids at all. So, I went in with a bit of trepidation. I thought that the babes behaved okay, not great, but okay. As we were leaving, the realtor bent down and said to my oldest, “You guys did such a nice job and behaved very well. You listen to your mama, she’s a good one!”
Sleep well my friends, dream well … the rest is up to you to continue to experience or not in this illuminating illusion and in the ‘real’ dream world.
41Joshua overcame them from Kadesh-barnea to Gaza, and all the land of Goshen as far as Gibeon.
The stretch of road alongside Loch Lomond is one of the few highlights of the trip.
In case we do want to be as followers of Christ taken up in the community of Christians we should have the same gospelfaith as Christ Jesus. Like Jesus trusted his Father we should trust him and Him who had send him. As Jesus told us to pray to the Father we should trust that Father as well.
* Xenon: Scientists call xenon one of the noble gases. It’s odorless, colorless, and found in very small quantities in the Earth’s atmosphere.
Here's what we ate: Cauliflower, Leek and Cheddar
Each of the books, except 5, are divided into chapters and verses. The 5 which aren’t divided by chapters are Obadiah, Philemon, 2 John, 3 John, and Jude. These are short books which only have verse divisions.
Wooten’s musical connection deepens with each new experience of rhythm, articulation, phrasing and rest. Wooten meets a series of peculiar but profound characters along the way and their wisdom encourages Wooten to unfold musically, and personally, until the student becomes the teacher. Through this book Wooten is the eccentric Music man showing up in our apartments out of nowhere and out of everywhere.
Again Unwin emphasises places near stations
When I first saw the film years ago, it occurred to me that it was one of the clearest explanations of American foreign policy I had ever seen. I am certain, however, that this was not the intention of the filmmaker. But let's see how the story illuminates our foreign policy.
A video playing in the Royal Horse Guards Museum. I thought that was cool they start them with no stirrups.
The next one I wanted to do some kind of hybrid with printing some word-art brushes on a piece of letter paper. Did the photo series and put a word on quote on that too. Got to use some scraps and some other little tidbits.
A hustle here and a hustle there
Sword hand calloused, chest exhales, emptying lungs.
3. (And my favorite) “Secrets are like cockroaches. If you have a secret you don’t want to share, people seem to gather around and crawl all over it.” (I imagine a woman saying this last one with her lip curled in bitter contempt).
I asked him where they were, and he indicated that they were about three miles east on Route 615. “They’ve got a sign up — you can’t miss it.”
Hannah began pinning the wet clothes onto the line till they stretched out, heavy in the still morning air. Later the breeze would pick up and dry the clothes as they flapped in the wind. It was a beautiful sight to behold. Hannah hoped the wind would stay gentle until the last piece was fully dry, but with spring days, one was never sure. The wind could have a mind of its own.
1) Caramel Truffle Pie (chocolate crumb/pecan crust, smooth caramel, and a rich chocolate/cream filling)
Sinethemba Dlamini, 15, was left lying on the lounge floor with her
I do not recommend that or the movie.
Prayer... sometimes the answer is Yes... sometimes the answer is No... sometimes the answer is Wait.
Over the past few days we have examined the microscopic world – that small world of cells serving as the basic life form for all living things. It is interesting how our own cells from the liver, brain, bone, small intestines, and skin look nothing like each other, yet they have many similar parts while the cells themselves performing different, but specialized functions.
This is an ABSOLUTE FIRST for me. There was that one time that I went on a business lunch date and apparently the person I was meeting took the "date" part of it more seriously than the "business," but that was only once. But this was proper, courtly, old-fashioned asking out. How he could remember me, I'm not sure, since I only vaguely remember even being at the extremely crowded event he referenced. But hey. The email was complete with delicate flattery and a catalog of all the possible things we could do if I would meet with him.
NO, NO, NO. Omigod, no! My fucking cap did not just fall out!?
Heat a pot of oil on the stove to a medium high heat. Now it’s time to begin wrapping as the oil heats up.
The global demand for robots and robot-related products was worth around $21 billion in 2010. The market is expected to grow to nearly $22 billion in 2011 and $30 billion by 2016, a compound annual growth rate (CAGR) of 6.7% between 2011 and 2016.
For Valentine's Day, I created a printable invitation that could be used with the So Sweet, All You Need is Love and Will You Be Mine party tags.
Our intellectual conversation covered many topics which included the so-called Star of David, which he said he did not use as the symbol G-d really gave the children of Israel …. he challenged me to explore the six-pointed star. And I accepted the challenge, with the plan that I would prove its Jewishness. After all, I wore one and felt I had to defend it, even to him.
During one of the writing groups I went to recently the subject of pen names came up. The question was essentially should you write under your own name or do you write under a pen name? What are the good and the bad of writing under either?
My favorite part is that it’s gotten so big and so competitive that PNR writers are at an all-time high with their creativity. I’ve read so many quality books within the genre. It excites me to the point that I would struggle to come up with a top ten list.
Shopped the decor closet & other areas of our home for these items. Got the candle holder (along with its partner that is residing on The Man's side table) at Kirklands some time ago on sale. The glass orbs came in a set of 5 in a metal basket (also Kirklands on sale a while back). I didn't like that look, so I used this metal tray that I had to hold just 3 orbs. The candles are hazelnut scented and smell so good. Sorry for the slight blurriness.
Do you spend time with your family? Because a man who doesn’t spend time with his family can never be a real man. ~Vito Corleone
After three days in Phuket exploring James Bond and Phi Phi islands, we make our way back to Kuala Lumpur, Malaysia for a finale of shopping and eating. Crab has been at the top of our To Eat list, and we head to Wong Poh in Petaling Jaya, a local favourite famous for their crab.
8. Population is to be maintained at levels (i.e. no immigration or sale of citizenships allowed) where the country is able to feed it’s citizens without import of food. Agriculture must be kept at levels that can feed the current population.
I offered to bring dessert (shocker) and was told my uncle recently started a low-carb/low-sugar diet. I started racking my brain on how to transform a cheesecake recipe to fit his dietary needs.
Stepparents can be recipients of all the problems (and we are told to be recipients with a smile on our face), yet we have little power or authority to make decisions that impact the child. Those, we are told, should be left to the parents. All of this makes rational sense, except for the part that is overlooked.
We had planned to host the part for nine out on our spacious patio, but the rain and unexpected chilly weather drove us inside. I tend to panic with these sorts of changes in plan, but luckily Mr. Thirdrow is so level headed. When I want to throw in the towel and never host anything in our tenny tiny house, he reminds me of all the reasons why we love our home and helps me come up with a plan to make sure our guests feel welcomed and not squished.
PCC FLEA MARKET: 1570 E. Colorado Blvd. Pasadena, Ca 91106
The airline is a huge buyer of new airplanes, with standing orders for more than 230 jets. It operates the world’s largest fleet of Boeing 777s, and was one of the first carriers to use Airbus’ double-decker A380.
is the area where countries make
Select committee also says James Murdoch showed 'wilful ignorance' of extent of phone hacking at News of the World
Do I share this story on WordPress and run away 3 of my 12 readers because I haven’t been true to what content I have been keeping or do I start another blog with “heavier content?”
Father, thank you for the victory in my life and I thank you for surrounding me with favor, therefore, I will confess favor daily giving the praise to you. In Jesus name, amen
Twinkle, Twinkle Little Boy
This is the awesome bag that Kim made me! (sorry,this one is mine!) she used a vintage tea towel with great red ruffles already on it! I love the color combination of red gray and black!
THE CUTE VALET GUY BRIAN AT A CERTAIN HOTEL IN VEGAS
The British people and their European friends need to understand that expansionist Islam makes us the 21st century version of the 20th Century Jews of Europe. It does not matter if we are Christian, Hindu, atheist, homosexual, lesbian, conservative or liberal — we will simply be defined by what we are not. We are not Islamic.
Lets use a savings goal as an example since it’s easily translatable into other goals (weight loss, event training, etc) and most people over the age of 10 have done this at some point:
Promise there will be more wedding updates and pictures to come!
McDiarmid MA, Weaver V. Fouling one’s own nest revisited. Am J Med 1993; 24: 1-9.
What you can expect:
And you know, we sometimes rent out our house to help pay the mortgage. I’m terrified she’s going to pull this stunt while there are renters there. In fact, she did. But the renters were at breakfast and didn’t see her. She calls me on my cell (the weekend the renters are there), and says, “I just stopped by your house, but you weren’t there.”
When The Special Gathering was having some concerns with our bookkeeping, the head of our ministry, Richard Stimson, went back to college to learn the fundamentals of accounting. While he didn’t need to learn how to be an expert in accounts receivable, he wanted to be able to have an overall vision regarding this area of ministry. I was impressed with his willingness to venture beyond his comfort zone to learn how to lead in this vital area.
I saw this wonderful film the other day as part of the Bread and Roses film festival – Nick Broomfield was there to answer questions afterwards so we learnt a little more about the making of the film. I enjoyed the film so much I wanted to write a short piece to encourage others to watch it.
Oh that castle In the Sky
“Real ale” is something that has a clear and objective definition, whereas “craft beer” is whatever people choose to call it, and can all too easily just become “beer from breweries that we approve of”. Real ale is a distinctive British tradition that is worthy of celebrating and preserving, although it is ignorant and narrow-minded to assert that it encompasses all that is good in the world of beer. To champion real ale shouldn’t mean you oppose everything that doesn’t qualify. As Michael Hardman, one of the four original founders of CAMRA, said in a recent newspaper interview: “I must point out that we’re not fighting against anything, we’re fighting for something.”
Hope your week is going great and continues to be great --YOU deserve it!
Complex problems are associated with illegal aliens who commit crimes. Criminal aliens tend to be drug-oriented and violent, often preying on members of their own cultures. If deported, they frequently use new names to reenter the United States and establish residence in different cities.
He was dressed as a Samurai Warrior
Mental compartments give us a sense of order for our overwhelming lives. Our minds daily race through these various categories, either checking our boxes off our lists (or not), gladly tucking devotional and Bible thoughts into that “Jesus” category. Feeling weak and inadequate with what we haven’t gotten done, we wrestle with who we are in the disorderliness. Struggling with hope and feeling condemned by what is lacking, Jesus seems distant, unavailable, and cold. We briefly acknowledge him and get back to work, sure that God will understand our mess.
With a cap under his chin.
Okra is one of my wife favourite vegetables and she would buy it often from the wet market. This sambal dish is very suitable for vegetarian nasi lemak (coconut milk rice).
OUT.
seared duck breast with an apricot glaze
I"d like to share with you a few things I learned from the Easter Bunny--- Everyone needs a friend who is all ears
It is beyond the time when fear can refuel the dark ones among you who feed on fear energy, or can detour or delay Earth’s ascension journey. However, fear still has a potent role in the destiny of individuals. With unconditional love, we urge you to develop your capacity for discernment and go within for answers. Whether you think of this as reaching your higher self, godself, inner knowing, God Himself or any other designation you may call this “voice,” it is your soul, wherein all truth is known, communicating with your consciousness.
We went to Orlando on Friday and touched back down in Raleigh last night... well, some of us did
Everyone loves Uncle Travey best. It's incredibly unfair when I spend all my time and money trying to earn their love and all he does is show up. He loves babies.Cutest family. Yes, the baby is in the carseat somewhere and no, Brylee is not possessed.
And through the
Her story echoes those of thousands of other families in southern and central Somalia who have been ravaged by conflict for years and were tipped over the edge by drought. Malnutrition is chronic in many parts of the Horn of Africa and there needs to be a long-term international effort to ensure nutritious foods reach the people who need them. Today, however, the most urgent needs are concentrated in southern and central Somalia. Even if we do not have a full picture, we know the situation is dire from the large numbers of Somalis arriving in weak condition in the capital, Mogadishu, and at camps across the border in Kenya and Ethiopia.
ROSEBANK: Two police officers arrested after soliciting bribes.
And here is an article from The L.A. Times, suggesting one hundred uses for the Meyer Lemon. They don’t say so, but the first thing you do is rub it gently between your hands to release the fragrance…
She took paper and pen and wrote down what she wanted: - surprisingly difficult to define. And even more difficult to contain to just the garden. Her wish list for the green areas began to grow and spread to other parts of her life. A wish list for herself, her family and then her marriage.
Again, I don't know why but Friday sounds like a good day to have confession! So here goes....
I went through my pictures searching for April decade pics and found some early ones of me and my brothers in 1962.
2) Peeing is like a game of chance – I have to pee. Then I have to pee again, twenty minutes later. And again in an hour. Did I drink something in the last ten minutes? Gotta pee it out, pronto. Flomax, I choose you!
I hope you'll join us this week. Remember the challenge is to CASE Danni's card and remember to use a butterfly, fairy or angel on it. Go check out all the details on the Flutter By Wednesday Blog.
A couple of weeks ago I went to a party at one of my friend’s house and while we were on the backyard enjoying the great afternoon while someone was grilling/barbecuing, some of them where smoking.
“We are handicapped in this area, as we could not get it. Even if there is a report, it is under the Official Secrets Act.
It was Carmi who encouraged me to start a blog, and who could ask for a better cheerleader or mentor? Frankly, her enthusiasm, energy and willingness to try something new gave me the courage to try it myself. I have to admit I needed that push because my tendency is go inside rather than outside, and keeping a blog is a good way to stay connected to the big picture. True, I wish I had the drive to post original art several times a week and to write something transformational, but when you get right down to it, you have to blog in the way that’s best for you and groove to your own inner timing, even if is kind of hit and miss.
Thanks for reading, and remember to make today a better day!
:: Have I mentioned that when Ryann is really trying to get my attention, she calls me Ashley? We taught her our names (first and last) just in case it would ever be relevant information for her. Well, now if she wants to push my buttons, or if I am not paying enough attention to her, she calls me Ashley. How do they learn things like that so fast??? Ryann has been stalling hardcore before bedtime and naptime lately, and last night was of course no different. Right after I closed the door she started whining, "Mama. Open the door. Please open the door. Mama open the door please. ASHLEY. OPEN THE DOOR! ASHLEY COME OPEN THE DOOR!" It was kind of funny.
Boy, did I find a lot of buzz in the comments about my recent travels. We have covered meat consumption, toilet paper and car usage, even white walls;)... Today, you have expressed concerns about my carbon footprint related to going away for Christmas and going to New York to tape The View. I am happy to provide answers: Some may think we are perfect, but we never said we were... we only try to do our best - and to be open about our successes and challenges.
The comedian grave digger with his 21 year hole
The disease permanently damages the optic nerve, which is what connects the eye to the brain, and causes a shrinking of the visual field.
Obviously, employers don’t like being rebuffed, particularly when they’ve spent a lot of time reviewing your material and preparing for the interview. Here are two real stories that are almost hard to believe:
Once a blogger shall always be a blogger. I realize that wherever I am, whatever I become, my love for blogging remains. For five years, I have experienced, and I felt what other bloggers have experienced.
Returning home, fired up and full of beans, he decided to show everyone who was whom in the local pecking order.
Questions borne of both curiosity and skepticism eventually lead Hohn to surrender his job as a teacher at a private Quaker school in Manhattan to pursue his search for answers. In a variety of vessels including a container ship and an icebreaker, Hohn makes trips to the Aleutians, Hawaii, Hong Kong and the Guangdong Province in China, and the Arctic Circle over three years. His chase for a yellow duck representing the comfort of youth quickly morphs into an adult romanticism of adventure. That spirit of exploration results in Hohn taking several risks out on the high seas, all to determine the possible fate of a plastic bath toy he could buy for $1 or less.
Cuba stresses the public health rather than business side of its work, with the state-controlled company declaring on its website: “The projects of the Labiofam Entrepreneurial Group are not implemented as commercial operations, but as integrated two-year-long projects within existing health programs.”
I broke down.
across our hoop of autumn sky.
No further Bloops have been heard since 1997, although other loud and unexplained sounds have been recorded in other places under different circumstances.
“I wanted you to have enough left for Maggie,” she thoughtfully told me.
I wanted to take this opportunity to pick some of your brains.
It's Monday. That's what's on my mind.
"Ivedy-Avedy," cried some. "Humpty-Dumpty," cried the others. And there was a great hullabaloo. Only the fir tree held its peace, though it thought to itself, "Am I to be left out of this? Isn't there anything I can do?" For all the fun of the evening had centered upon it, and it had played its part well.
David Daniel (UKIP) 366
Otter Creek Brewing / Wolaver's Otter Creek Vermont Lager
Cartridge: Once Upon a Princess-Butterfly
50 Triceps Overhead Extension
Our first challenge this month is to use at least 3 hearts. Well, I got a little carried away and added quite a few more! I hand drew and cut these so please excuse the fact that they are all a little wonky and different!
I have another thought this month, something a little more on the serious side.
He brought some of the love you learned
But I would not have you to be ignorant, brethren, concerning them which are asleep, that ye sorrow not, even as others which have no hope. For if we believe that Jesus died and rose again, even so them also which sleep in Jesus will God bring with him. For this we say unto you by the word of the Lord, that we which are alive and remain unto the coming of the Lord shall not prevent them which are asleep. For the Lord himself shall descend from heaven with a shout, with the voice of the archangel, and with the trump of God: and the dead in Christ shall rise first: Then we which are alive and remain shall be caught up together with them in the clouds, to meet the Lord in the air: and so shall we ever be with the Lord. Wherefore comfort one another with these words.
- "off" is a "television channel" (Off is a choice)
445. Dollar Dog @ Sly Fox Brewery (Phoenixville, PA) 1:05 p.m.
Well, it was more for pleasure really. We didn't really have a concept, it was just a thing that happened. But it could have been quite good, some of the tunes we did as Blue Meanies ended up on my first solo album and everybody said they were great, so we must have had something. If anybody had had the foresight to allow us to develop for a year or so, it might have been quite good.
recently on a sunny Sunday afternoon our Portland Wuwo Tea Ceremony group was able to enjoy tea outdoors.
The court heard that Puay had surrounded the deceased with other gang members and chased him during the assault.
Honey Gelato
I was on my way to poker (third, grrrrrr. 2-fucking-AM I get home, for third, with no money). I kind of forgot about it today, but after the kids were asleep, I saw the towel draped over the sink reminding me not to run water down it. Weighing the options of trying it myself and calling an after-hours plumber, poverty won out, and I went to borrow a neighbor's pipe wrench. I think we have exactly one adjustable wrench, and a set of socket wrenches that I always forget we have. (I do have "The Gator Grip," which is pretty much sufficient for all your wrenching needs, but I digress.) Anyway, we do not have a pipe wrench.
Do we see any signs of satanic activity, miracles and signs that are leading people astray today? Yes, this has become one of the leading characteristics especially of the last decades. I mean in particular, for example, the increase in the last several decades of outright Satanism – Satan-worship – which only in these last twenty years or so has achieved such openness and notoriety. People openly call themselves witches. Perhaps few call themselves Satanists, but it has become a recognized religion in our society, and very many are seriously involved in the practice of witchcraft. (The widely publicized ritual murders of recent years are only the surface of a deep current of evil and demon-worship.)
“An Evangelistic Meeting. Pattern your program after that of a modern revival meeting. A live leader of song should have charge of the music. The songs should be songs of soul-winning. Have a number of church-members to give brief testimonies and urge the young people to make decisions for Christ. The minister should be invited to make a closing exhortation and hear the confessions of faith, if such is the usual order. Personal work prior to the meeting itself will make it more effective in every way” (James DeForest Murch, Successful C.E. Prayer-Meetings (Cincinnati, OH: The Standard Publishing Company, pp. 66-67).
to be doing? it can be anything. and once that light has gone on.
As I waited in a rather grand reception room as my father attended his meeting, my eyes were increasingly drawn to a beautiful young woman sitting at the big polished desk. I don’t remember what she was wearing, just that I was very impressed with her beauty and poise.
Second, I didn’t “accuse” Bob. What I said was, “Or how about a talk he gave in Canada during which this was reported”. That’s not—and by definition can’t be—calumny, because it’s true. Bob was, in fact, reported to have said exactly what I indicated. There were two people at the presentation who state that’s what they heard him say, namely, that "if you did not believe in a geocentric universe you were atheist." I did state that if he didn’t say it, then that’s fine, but there’s an audio recording. Still, I left open the possibility that he didn’t say it. However, given the extreme rhetoric that Bob regularly deploys, along with the constant linkage throughout his writings between atheism and a denial of geocentrism, I find the allegation at least plausible, which is why I mentioned it.
She’s the beard.
The Index prepared by George Anastaplo for The Bible volume had to be trimmed somewhat by the publisher in 2008. Space limitations and editorial policies were among the factors contributing to the reshaping of the Bible Index when that book was published.
REO has indicated that it will try to spin the Battersea site off into a new corporate entity which might attract investors, and today’s news will only boost those plans. According to REO the approval this morning will be followed by “the next stage of the process [which] will see the application referred to the Mayor of London and the Secretary of State for Communities and Local Government for their consideration.” Mayor of London, Boris Johnson, is supportive of the development though the position of Eric Pickles, the Minister for Communities and Local Government is not so clear.
Dp from Stash
Our time in England was surreal for so many reasons, but we were thankful that we were able to be there in England as a family with Jen and Jeff's parents. The Air Force was truly amazing in how well they provided so much and accomodated us while we were in England, always present to help Sam's wife Jen, as well as representing the squadron and the base for the memorial for Sam. There was also a Celebration of Life for Sam in Fulton, Missouri and a graveside service with full military honors for Sam in Medford, Oregon. Jeff's work has been truly remarkable in giving us the time and assistance we needed to travel. We are so thankful for the family we are a part of and the way God provides at just the right time.
Before I get to my post, I would like to welcome my blog's new follower. I'm so happy you decided to click the magic little follow button and hope you will find reason to stop in from time to time!
On his next visit the doctor gave him a shot, but that didn't do any good.
Telegraph reader Matt Kilcoyne writes: I was on the way home to vote and on the platform I saw a soldier going home from the barracks with a large teddy bear (almost bigger than him). It lifted my day so much. If you have a photograph you’d like us to consider for a picture gallery, please email it to mypic@telegraph.co.uk, supplying a little info on where and when the picture was taken.Picture: Matt Kilcoyne
1. Someone who listens and is not judgmental
Other – 3.2%
Parliament we are told will be debating the issue of EU membership and the likelyhood of a referendum for the people to decide the issue. I urge you all to write to your local MP and urge him/her to give the people a referendum.
My personal religious experience: The Lord Jesus is my savior, my shepherd, my teacher, my brother, and my friend. Apart from Him I am nothing and can do nothing. He rescued me from the pit of destruction many years ago. Without Him I would be dead, gone, and forgotten. He gave me back my self, my soul, and my dreams. Through the Holy Spirit, He gives me the strength and the purpose to carry on day after day.
Prepare the grill to make a hot fire.
When I was 6 years old, yeah, funny how that works, my best friends, the twins from down the block who were almost six, were playing with me in my back yard. It was spring and hot and I thought I would get us all cold cokes so I went in through the back door to the kitchen and
It was interesting reading Emily Bronte’s poems. I found myself wishing often that I knew more about the Gondal epic so that I could really understand the background of some of the characters, but the prose itself was beautiful. The poems often touch on sadness and despair, loneliness and heartache. Emily was not one to write cheerful poetry, but isn’t poetry often melancholy? I found that I preferred her non-Gondal poems and found them to be much more powerful.
If you already know the address of the feed you want to subscribe to, you can just click the Add Subscriptions link and paste the address in the text field that appears. Otherwise, you can use our directory for an easy way to find and add feeds. As a third option, you can always find your own feeds.
Ms. D and Makizushi split a similar plate, then, when Makizushi was out of the room, Ms. D and Umami went for another plate, Thai Chicken Quesadilla.
Stevens Point Brewery Point Belgian White
I agree 250 kids nationwide is a significant number, but is it really "1000% more" than the number killed by sex offenders? That would mean sex offenders kill 25 kids or less per year. Maybe that's accurate, I don't know the data. I only pointed out that you're dramatically overstating the problem when you falsely bloviate that "drunk drivers kill enough people to fill a mid sized CITY 45,000-55,000 PEOPLE A YEAR."
My hope is that someday we’ll meet again, like the end of The Way We Were. The music will swell and we’ll put your DVDs in our cart and I’ll get to say, “Your run was lovely, House.” And mean it.
I don't believe this issue is as cut and dry as people make it out to be. People are put in either the florescent rainbow camp or the brainwashed h8tr camp and I've never felt like I belong to either. After much thinking and discussing and several totally awesome gay friends (even in Utah, I know!), I have come to two main conclusions:
Yoochun smiled and hug him tighter. “Gomawo, for teaching me how to love…” He kiss Junsu softly. “Saranghae, Junsu ah…”
I’m sure that we would differ less,
Don't forget to post a comment so we know you added a card! If you upload to an online gallery, please use the tag SCCC8 so that we can all enjoy your cards.
After watching Shelley work really hard for the birth of her baby girl, I too was exhausted but oh so proud of my baby girl. It's hard to see your own child in pain even if the result will be another sweet girl to love. Sweet Man was a trooper and was the very first to hold GK. In fact, the reason she is called GK, besides those being her initials, is because of Sweet Man. GK in his mind stands for grandkid.....so that's the name of that tune. See I'm not the only old Cuckoo in the Casa.
Buyer reviews of HP G42-475DX Laptop / AMD Phenom II Processor / 14″ LED HD Display / 4GB DDR3 Memory / 320GB Hard Drive / Multiformat DVD±RW/CD-RW drive with double-layer support / Built-in webcam with microphone / Microsoft Windows 7 Home Premium- Biscotti are available on the merchant’s site, check it by click on the link below.
So,now my therapist want me to "remember" what made me want to be a girl.I said that I really doesn't think that someone made me think like that.And she think that I need to know when this started to do the family session I was hoping for.I know now that in Brazil there is not right age for hormones and no right time to therapy before hormones,it depends on the therapist.
Cookies were gone, stockings were full.
It’s a toss up between Rango and Rio for me, so I’m including them both. The Rango teaser lost me, its first trailer hooked me, and then the subsequent trailer and Big Bowl spot kinda lost me again. So I’m not sure. It looks like it’s got a lot more scope than Rio where adult viewers are concerned, plus it’s got Johnny Depp. But who knows? Depp can’t save everything; remember The Tourist? Rio on the other hand seems like a surer bet, even if it looks like it’s largely catering to kids. I like Ice Age 3, though the first one was better. I know Pixar has Cars 2 lined up this year, but Cars seriously felt like Pixar on auto-pilot, so I’m not including Cars 2 even though I’ll probably watch it
So I only knew that tiny slice of her life that she reserved for her creative longings - indeed what I did know of Margaret was a thing I recognized in myself and in many of the people I met (and continue to meet) at SCBWI ... that deep well of creative yearning, that desperation to set down on paper the colours and emotions and terrors that swirled around in one's imagination.
It is always exciting to be part of a major new development, and I believe that the Journal of Cryptozoology marks a major new development in the advancement and mainstream awareness of cryptozoology. I hope that you will too.
The heart needed to exist.
is almost terrifying were
"Without a limber and flexible new Transformerroboticaeroplane you will live for ever in darkness."
Reports said that Chinese engineers’ team was on way to inspect the Kachchi Canal, when it was attacked, which resulted in the death of five persons including three security men, while eleven persons were wounded.
Why is it that children behave better when others are around and don’t throw as many fits when the “other parent” comes home from work?
André is onboard the orbital outpost for ESA’s long duration mission, PromISSe.
Favorite drink: tea
It's 4am. I'm awake. I'm cold, I'm restless. My mind is working like a navvy, churning, burning kilojoules as it labours through the what-ifs, the maybes, the wherefores, the no-ways. In those dark hours, every bad thing that has ever happened to me, to the world, slips frame-by-frame through my memory banks. Every bad thing that could ever happen to my children, to the world, clanks through my imagination in heavy boots.
I have spent most of my free time today trying to sort this.
There were several things that we could have chosen to do but after due consideration we decided we had done enough for today and would prefer to return home. As we reached the station, a train for Victoria was pulling in and as our tickets were for “London Terminals” and not any specific station, we went aboard.
One gorgeous Arctic summer day, my dad, sister and I took a trip. We finally found an opportunity to travel around forty miles up the beach of the Arctic Ocean to "see the sights." Nearly a hundred years ago, the ancestors of the Eskimo people in our village lived in another community. Their houses were made of driftwood and sod and they lived entirely off the land. I can't express the wonder of seeing firsthand these remains of Eskimo history. The Lord truly blessed our little journey -- and He gave me a beautiful day for capturing these timeless scenes, besides!
Homebirth via public hospitals is a valuable addition to publicly funded maternity services. Women and their babies benefit, as homebirth requires the promotion of normal physiological birthing, feeding, and nurture processes. Midwives benefit in being separated from reliance on unnecessary medical interventions.
Irving
Tanna: A Tanna (תנא, Heb. ‘repeaters,’ ‘teachers’) is a Mishnaic Rabbi, which means one who lived and taught from around 200 BCE until around 200 CE. All the Sages mentioned in the Mishnah are Tannaim.
sliced almonds, optional
Our instructor then continued to tell us Sundays would be our long run, and we would be doing 9 km (just over 5.5 mi). I thought, “are you kidding me, don’t you know I haven’t run since October!” Then the angel on my other shoulder told me, “you can do it! You’ve run before, you’ve even done 1 half-marathon, you know you can do it!”
Row 18-21- ch1, turn, sc in ea sc (6)
some sections there are no street lights
Above all, do not allow your cost saving interests get ahead of good claims practices. Time and time again, the news will feature an employer who thought that by simply understating the number of employees they had and/or under reporting payroll, they could enjoy a discount in payroll. However, this practice is considered as insurance fraud and carries severe penalties for those who perpetrate this act. Below are some excerpts from the Los Angeles Times which highlight how this seemingly good idea can go very wrong.
UMNO seems to hint that the minorities should know their place and accept the status quo. Apparently, any challenge to they being the ‘master’ will invoke the ire of UMNO. There can never be national unity if a single ethnic group can own the biggest share of the nation’s wealth. There can never be national unity if schools and colleges are identified by race and religion or only meant for a single race. There can never be national unity if the minorities are not well represented in the government. Race and religion cannot be the excuse for UMNO’s failure in integrating the races.
Payments due. Prompt payment for all money due or accrued.
produced by: Ann Lordon and George Sluizer
For my feature card, I've chosen to go with bright, happy colours and this adorable Beach Marci stamp by La La Land Crafts! You can find the recipe for the card and the instructions on My Blog!
Harper has been getting off lightly for the last ten days while I travelled Newfoundland. Well, Herr Harper its over now and time to get back to basic’s
And so for the next few hours, Moon the Mod whippet paced up and down the laminate flooring. He didn't play with his toys and he didn't even eat, there was far too much on his mind. Maybe his master wouldn't know what was going on later, after all, from a human’s point of view it just looked like a load of dogs (wearing clothes!) running around on a beach! But Stella would be there!
Westminster has passed over 300 major laws, like the Civil Contingencies Act, to "harmonise" our laws with the EU's. The loss of freedoms and emerging police state is the result.
But here endeth 2011. I'm off to the beer fridge to begin putting 2012 into some sort of drinking order.
Some of the comments:
So from now on there will be at least one sweetpea project/week again.
Last time I took on a grilled cheese was early on in this blog, when I made a Plum, Blue Cheese and Balsamic version that combined sweet, salty and tangy flavors into each bite. This recipe goes the opposite direction, creating a rustic, umami-focused dish.
Welcome to the fourth edition of The Pulse -- The State of the Art -- a survey in words and pictures of the online artist community. Nearly 150 artists have answered a list of questions which make up The Pulse. Their responses will be presented as a series of online and print projects. Secret Sunday was the first project and the links to all the secrets can be found on the sidebar of my blog. The Book Guild is the second project and Chapter 5 starts right now!
Green tea is high in polyphenols, like EGCG. These polyphenols help increase your metabolism. By raising your metabolism you will increase the amount of calories burned throughout the day for all activities, and also while sitting, therefore increasing the amount of fat you will burn.
· Rather than meditating on God’s faithfulness, faulty negative thinking begins (1 Kings 19:4).
1 Heart of the USA 4:01
And today finally I get to know her name.
Ever wonder what people are thinking when they say those two seemingly innocent words? I always am. I mean, set aside the whole "I psychoanalyze everything" thing I have going on, but don't you wonder what compelled them to say the thing they're kidding about in the first place?
And so we'll spend the new few days transitioning back into the house. The Trek is parked out front (our neighbors must love that) so we can begin unloading tomorrow... it will take several hours to brings clothes, books, tools and other equipment back into the house and then put everything away.
This is the menu for the Tangaroa Terrace. They offer more than the Tiki Bar although it is from the same kitchen.
And it's not just vaccinations. It's autistic health more broadly.
Did you mail out any VIP invitations? Did you get anything back?
Second, go watch this:
O you who believe! When you meet those who disbelieve in a battlefield, never turn your backs to them. (V.8:15).
The movie is named after the poem Invictus, a favorite of my father's and a piece of writing that gives me chills every time I read it, let alone hear it spoken in Morgan Freeman's unmistakably mellifluous voice. The movie depicts both Mandela and the rugby captain drawing strength from the poem in their time of need.
Cakes for a Cause is an event that has been going on in the Piqua area for several years. It's an event that raises money for grants for local Non-Profit Organization.
We were off to the festival theatre in Stratford Ontario to see Camelot yesterday. We packed up the babies and grabbed the old ladies..... and off we all went. Hailey couldn't go because she was too little. Jeff stayed behind with her. We were NOT allowed to take pictures inside the Festival Theatre......... the set was copyrighted.
it's done. we're home. we should have results on monday.
Now, do I even dare to watch Star Trek V: The Final Frontier?
hundred
As you leave, ask yourself if your bathroom looks and smells clean. Imagine that you are taking a guest around your house. (This happens often, I find. Sometimes they are looking for their child, sometimes they want a tour. It's revealing, isn't it?) What would you change right now if a non-family member were there? Do it!
“A decade ago, almost everyone would have said efforts to get Brazil to stop cutting down the Amazon were a total failure,” said Doug Boucher, head of the Tropical Forest and Climate Initiative at the Union of Concerned Scientists. “Thanks to a shift in political dynamics and rise of a strong environmental movement, it became a huge success story.”
With 739 Franklin looking closer and closer to finished and 3D's under construction, it won't be long until every storefront other than the churches and Had Associates on that block has undergone at least a minor renovation, all in under four years (and all the storefronts will be occupied). The storefronts between Eastern and Park are rapidly filling up - will this mean more development further north (and south across the parkway) on Franklin, or will competition get tight for choice spots in that four-block district? We'll know soon enough.
We attended the show at the newly renovated Austin Music Hall. It's not done, actually; it's really still got a lot of plywood and taped drywall visible. And, surprisingly, it's not a lot bigger. They added some room on the sides of the upstairs and downstairs, and they put on a smoking balcony and some extra bars, but that's about all that I could see, other than a nifty little starfucker area right over the stage, off to the side. Milena and I briefly considered asking what it would take to sit back there, but decided against it.
As many as 64 percent of the interviewees said they avoid speaking dialects due to their “rustic pronunciation”, according to the survey.
If you decide that you aren’t ready to engage with social computing but you can’t afford to ignore it, a low-risk option is to merely monitor what is being said about your enterprise online.
-He seriously thought convincing Emma would be that simple? I know he’s not the psychologist, but he’s the one who’s been around other people in this world most of his life, he knows how hard it is for most of them to believe. He seriously thought that getting her to acknowledge “I’m the boy who found you” would automatically lead to “so the curse is real”? Also, no one should understand better Emma’s qualms about accepting responsibility. Pinocchio couldn’t make allowances for that in his plan??? Dumbass.
I watched "The Purple Rose of Cairo" (1985) a few days ago. The movie takes place during the depression in New Jersey. Only someone like Woody Allen could invent such a clever and creative plot......movie characters leaving the screen and joining the real world. Loved it!!
Isaac: "Joni said that you just make them and put them on the shelf and look at them and don't play with them. But I would want to play with them."
This food and travel documentary consists of 2 parts, with each part containing two episodes each, and is a treat in every way. The two greedy Italians take you on a personal journey through Italy, with inputs of their traditional Italian upbringing and of course creating mouth watering dishes using local ingredients.
Now, in all fairness to Zoya, this finger is always the problem child - a heavy door slammed on it when I was younger, and now it has a ridge on the side with the chip. That area is more flexible weaker, and my polish always chips there (usually after 1-2 days).
Here are some more Great Videos of one of my favorite ladies, Dolores Cannon. Again her books are so informative, so if you don’t get to see her seminars, reading her books bring you close to her. I have watched many of her interviews and these were a few that I selected that I feel would be of great help to you. Enjoy. I have to say, these interviews were so nicely done. I believe you will enjoy her as much as myself, you can’t help but learn something from these.
Social Assistance
I too think it's the cutest thing ever
Sunday, 10/16/2010. Lynda’s mini petting zoo… always a hit with kids!
Since this blog has been renamed "Confessions of a Zombie Killer" here are two more things that happened since yesterday's article. How ridiculous is it that I have to update the update?!
B: GMA News’ Arnold Clavio
My younger native Southern Californian hairdresser knows this area well. She sometimes entertains me with her memories of when people, cars and freeways were not so prevalent as now -- her then back road driving trips past now landmark sites, the beach and nearby snow-covered mountains with young friends fortunate to have a car.
Jeffrey Kaye continues lifting the veil on 9-11 intelligence failures with a new article at Truthout. The end of the article reviews some of what is known in public about Kirk von Ackermann.
“The fuck you did,” I say.
My response to you addresses the following statements in your letter to Mr. Dewani. I would suggest that if you follow my recommendations, you are far more likely to provide Mr. Dewani with a free and fair trial, where you can find the honest answers to your questions:
He replied “Ok, take care mate!” and tried to hug me!!!!! So I just shook his hand and said “Laters, man” and he seemed happy with that and went wandering off. I might have got lucky there!
How low has out country sunk that the likes of Olivia, Arshad, Denise and Anthony now tell us how to think.
That she despises Republican County Commissioner Tom Mielke is no secret. She wears her dislike of him on her chest as if a Military Medal to be proud of. I even once asked her in the comments of one post “Stephanie, does Tim Mielke ever do anything right in your eyes?” My question was not answered of course.
Stone Brewing Co. Stone Imperial Russian Stout
Faithful is, by definition, being true to one’s word. Nothing could describe this trio’s musical mission better. Faithful certainly restores my faith in the jazz piano trio.
Below are a few benefits of volunteering and some statistics in regards to being active in your community from http://www.worldvolunteerweb.org/:
Consider not using eye contact at all. You can imagine what this is like by picturing a conversation between you and a group of friends over lunch. What if you spoke to these friends without meeting any of their eyes for the duration of your lunch? Those friends would think you were dishonest, deceptive, or, even worse, crazy.
But hey, everyone needs to work. Bloodsport 2 stands as an abysmal reminder that even the Gods of Cult Cinema need to pay their bills, and James Hong is no exception.
The IoM describes this “vaccine authority” as a group that “…could become a source of appropriate reliable information to the media health care personnel, policy-makers, and the public.” (i.e. a vaccine propaganda Ministry of Truth.)
Blitz together all of the above ingredients in a blender with a 1/4 cup of water, then pour into a medium saucepan containing a splash of vegetable oil. Fry for a couple of minutes, then add
My guess is that Germany's refusal to countenance any form of EU subsidies, debt-pooling, or fiscal union -- other than policing the budgets of captive states -- has definitively broken the EMU spell. Latin nations by increasingly regard talk euro of solidarity as humbug. It has been a nasty shock. The era of national economic rearmament in Europe has begun.
Still, I listen more to him – it is impossible not to.
Oates, who said the shooting was in self-defense, is charged with manslaughter and a weapons violation in Olivera’s killing. But some in the community, including Olivera’s family, want the charge upgraded to murder.
In the next story, Mudd is back, and this time he has found a planet of abandoned high-tech androids that have been waiting for a human to serve for over a million years. He quickly molds them to his liking (including hundreds of identical fem-bots "programmed for pleasure"). The bots, however, want more humans to study and serve, so Mudd sneakily gets the Enterprise crew onto the planet, where they find it very difficult to leave. When the bots' plan to take over the universe and enslave humanity in a web of pleasure is revealed, Kirk and his crew use illogic (even Spock!) to get the bots' circuits to lock up so they can escape (there might be an ad at the start of this video, but it is worth it):
The reason we should oppose such actions by the US, or any other Imperialist power, is simple. They will not be acting in OUR interest, but against it. We should be under no illusion that, having established its right, to carry out such interventions, should workers ever establish anything approaching a Workers Government, let alone a Workers State, the Imperialists would use all the tools of their ideological and media monopoly to paint it in the same light, as a prelude to bombing the hell out of it. Those who claim to be on the Left, but who fail to oppose the actions of the Imperialists, in Libya and elsewhere, themselves act as agents of that Imperialism, either unconsciously or otherwise.
In the beginning of the video Jason talks about how he started on this journey almost 10 years ago. Seriously 10 YEARS, in our facebook world all has been forgotten in 2 weeks..but 10 years?? Think of all the doors slammed in their face, the "no thank you's", set backs...and to keep going, growing, moving forward, expanding, redirecting. Amazing.
Blushing Bride DSP
If using two-sided origami paper, lay your paper with the patterned or colored side down before starting to fold.
Be arrogant if you wish. Look down on others and treat them poorly, if you wish. But realize that if you do so, you’re only allowing your own inner weaknesses to shine through, and you’re not fooling anyone. Not the people around you, who hold you in disdain, not God who made you and loves you and knows all about you, and not yourself. And for those who must deal with arrogance on a regular basis, please keep in mind that arrogant people treat you poorly only because they’re needier than you, and they haven’t yet admitted to themselves that they are needy. They need and deserve your compassion, not your anger.
"What kind of 'cleaning' do they do?" I ask while I watch the white powder seem to dissapear from her head.
Curves Class Cards
James Telesford is currently a Ph.D. candidate in the social-personality psychology program at UC Berkeley. His broad research interests consist of 1) the effects of using racial humor on intergroup relations and 2) the impact of Black racial identity on several outcomes, including academic achievement and psychological well-being.
From that afternoon’s walking group, I only saw Eva, Guille, and Or. I also met two other Spaniards, Anghel (not sure if that’s how he spells his name) and Larissa. There were a few other Romanian girls at our table but I only knew Lily. She’s nice too and dances really well. Mari-an and I didn’t go out to the club with them after karaoke. Honestly, we were both very tired and I was particularly feeling my age. But that didn’t stop me from taking a few more night photos.
I started it and thought it was pretty good, better than I thought it would be then somewhere along the way I found myself falling in love with it. Because somehow this book just seemed to do everything right.
Hello blog-land! I'm having a happy day! One of those days when you just feel good and happy for absolutely no reason whatsoever! Days like today are what this blog is all about! When I feel good I like to think about happy things and the things I am looking forward to. Happiness breeds happiness and all that!
And yes, there is use of handcuffs, between the bad guys as well as Sunny and Judson…but I won’t spoil it by revealing too much! And yes again, Judson doesn’t necessarily wear a police man’s uniform, since he’s a detective he mainly dresses in street clothes or a suit, but that’s his uniform and it can be damn sexy!
Pépé le Moko (France…Julien Duvivier)
Green Day, Wake me up when September ends.
So now I'm going to get all metaphorical and junk. I just moved into a new apartment and I have this really long hallway that goes nearly the whole length of the apartment. I can't figure out what I want to do with it, but I know there must be something to make it look way less boring.
You forgot the color film, Michael,
We marveled at her true knot in the cord, took pictures, her weight, 8lbs 5oz, and the midwives gave her a thorough, yet quick evaluation and then she was back in my arms. I don't even think my mother held her for hours and hours after her birth. It was perfection, even the postpartum.
The more aggressive you are in your behavior, the more drastically you turn the knobs, the longer it will take to reach the right temperature.
I can't help but think that it's going to be a long road for both Jeffrey and his mom unless she learns to get control over him.
I walked outside and fluffed the rug on the porch, pretending to have a purpose for being out front. The kids, unphased, continued to fight to photograph the girl, while she chased them and kicked them. A few got back into what I later found out was the girl’s car and would drive at the group until they all jumped out of the way or they jumped on top of the car (again, their parents would be happy to know that the money they spend on her cute blue convertible was so well appreciated). I walked over to the driveway, planted my feet, crossed my arms, and gave the almighty teacher death stare that I have perfected over the past 3 years. I frantically searched my brain for something to yell that would get them away from my house, but wouldn’t sound bitchy. After all, I am half way to 50, not 50. Nothing came to mind. I just stared and seethed while I watched their shenanigans go on.
He ran to the back of the house where a set of Bilco doors led to a basement. He stepped towards them, through them, and descended into the basement of the red brick house.
Yes some laughed @ Camping’s failed prediction, even saying they were going to party like crazy friday night (just in case). While others, the end of the world did come (Sunday) for them in a horrible devastating way!
Movement: More and more. I still have my small moments of panic when I think he should be moving around and he's not, but I'm trying to let. it. go.
Bitterness Units: 29
The first thing that got me interested in this book was the imagination and idea’s that the author put into this book. While the book is based in our world the war has changed so much that it took my breath away. The author writing style also helped towards the easy flow of the book and that fact that the book was not over described to the point that it becomes boring the author made shore you knew that facts but not to the point of you losing interested.
Does this mean that the ordinances or the Scriptures or the Law bring eternal life? No! Jesus Himself said to the Jewish leaders who refused to believe His claims, even after plenty of miracles and evidences, “You search the Scriptures, because you think that in them you have eternal life; and it is these that bear witness of Me; and you are unwilling to come to Me, that you may have life.” (John 5:39)
I attended a writers workshop on the weekend, hosted by thriller writer, James Phelan. This was my first workshop with ACT Writers (located in Canberra), it was a small and friendly group and James was very approachable.
Being a cup-half-full kinda guy, I persist in my quest because I am certain that all is not lost - yet. The tipping point has not been reached and the challenge is to find a way to avoid getting there.
Click on the picture above for a site of cool artworks of hearts, love and such. It is pretty good. From me, a little poem, a tale of the heart:
14. Contraposition
Pensee has a beautiful shine and the shimmer is present, but not over the top.
xi) besides including clear provisions on transfer of technology in treaties under negotiation in WIPO, a new subsidiary body within WIPO (Standing Committee on IP and the Transfer of Technology) shall be established in order to ensure an effective transfer of technology to developing countries, including the creation of an international regime that would promote access by the developing countries to the results of publicly funded research in the developed countries;
One thing the wind did provide was another opportunity to observe different species' ways of dealing with it. I've written before that gulls, especially herring gulls and ring-billed gulls tack. This allows them to make progress flying into the wind. For reasons I do not understand, American crows do not tack. They keep trying to fly straight into the wind and keep getting blown back. Maybe someone from Cornell Lab of Ornithology could enlighten me about that. The northern gannets seemed unaffected by the wind as they circled and dove into the schools of fish. As I noted last week, fish and gannets seemed to move together throughout the morning.
I listen to very few and chances are, you aren’t part of that elite.
In a follow up to my previous post, I'll report on how Thanksgiving went with my aversion to eating things that had parents or things that come from things that had parents.
Hey, ho, here we go!
Bike/Swim for about an hour (you have been quietly turning up the intensity we hope?) Followed by:
This law will mean that someone like Eddie Long who groomed the boys until they were old enough to sleep with will require a felony count of grooming that he would have had to fight in court. There is a case in California where a teacher and his eighteen year old girlfriend appeared on the news saying that they are in love.
So, along with the bored gods, I'm asking for your energy and support as Heir takes the final exam on Thursday.
Support for e-mail attachments
Here is a quick pic of what it looks like done! I finally got the clock die and added it. Its all glued together now as well. I will try to get better photos, the glare is too much.
The decline in NST’s circulation and therefore relevance may actually be caused by these things in the “many”. The “many” in the NST are from the school of journalism from one educational institution. And you know they operate like a secret society, guarding entry into the brotherhood, jealous of anyone not schooled in the same values. Above all, they have this overinflated notion of self-importance that THEY and THEY ALONE have the right to have an opinion on anything. This is the main cause of NST’s degeneration.
4) Notre Dame Christmas events
Phew… sorry about the yelling there… just often seems like no one is listening when you say that.
In other thoughts, I'd thought I'd share a couple funny things with you today to get you through the midweek slump. The first is a pinterest find that I found hilarious!
“There is no legitimate penal purpose for keeping these men in solitary. Louisiana authorities must end this inhumanity.”
“In October 2010, cartel members kidnapped Mario Gonzalez Rodriguez, the brother of the Attorney General for the Mexican state of Chihuahua, where Juarez is located. The cartel posted a video of the kidnapped Rodriguez online, in which he alleged, under duress, that his sister had ordered killings at the behest of the Juarez cartel. The video went viral and became a major news story in Mexico. Two weeks later, Mexican authorities found Rodriguez’s body in a shallow grave. In a subsequent shootout with cartel members responsible for the murder, police arrested eight and recovered sixteen weapons. Two of these weapons traced back to Operation Fast and Furious. Although the Department of Justice learned that these weapons traced back to Fast and Furious almost immediately, no one informed the Mexican government. Not until congressional investigators were on the verge of learning the truth about the connection did an ATF agent in Mexico finally tell the Mexican Attorney General in June 2011 – seven months after Rodriguez’s murder.”
Not this week.
Joan Rivers is coming to Kim Kardashian’s defense, saying it’s not right for the Hollywood Walk of Fame to prohibit the handprints of reality stars from gracing its famous sidewalk.
Date: Mon, 2 Apr 2012 14:39:40 +1200
First, forget everything you think you know about Mild. Things like colour and strength. Mild isn't necessarily meek. Or dark. Or lightly-hopped even. All of those characteristics are 20th century innovations. We're going back to a proper Mild. Beers brewed when Queen Victoria was still a randy teenager.
Central Alabama Antique & Appraisal Market
For some time Steve Milloy of Junkscience.com has been adamadantly asking the EPA to 'show us the bodies' in their claim that they save tens of thousands of lives every year with their "high-cost-for-imaginary benefit programs covering emissions of greenhouse gases, mercury, sulfur dioxide and nitrous oxides".
Here's the print: (and as I post this, this is the first time my Dad is seeing this...he didn't know that I had this picture reproduced on canvas...what do you think, Dad?)
*Entry 7: Make any purchase from The Homestead Company and receive (10) Extra entries.
President Sukarno: Revolutionary Extraordinaire. Sukarno, Man Against Oppression. Sukarno, who bravely, brilliantly led the Indonesian overthrow of the ‘oppressive colonial’ Dutch Government.
Diana Vreeland. Now there's a bad girl after my heart. According to her granddaughter-in-law, Lisa Immordino Vreeland, who wrote a biography about the flamboyant Vogue magazine editor, “The legacy Mrs. Vreeland left behind is extremely strong and deep, and goes beyond being a mere fashion revolutionary: she really helped change social history and emancipated women. Her life, which spanned 1903 until 1989, is by all means a vivid portrait of the 20th century.”
This is my great niece, Ava Marie. She celebrated her first birthday over the weekend. Unfortunately, I was flying home from sunny California Saturday, when her mommy had the party. After seeing the pictures from the party, I can't wait to stop over and give Ava the biggest birthday kiss and hug ever.
Wink of an Eye
Alexis Arquette in Lords of Dogtown, 2005.
As I look out my window tonight, all I see is blowing snow. I can hardly see across the street! We've had an unprecedented amount of snow here in the lovely northeast. This is 'crippling' storm number 3 and we're expected 12-24 inches of snow on top of the snow already on the ground. Personally, I love the snow. Except it always makes me long for the boys.
I like the pastel faux velvet armchairs kind of shoved together every which way, surrounding a plastic pool-side table. I'll call this little nook The Asian Poolside British Grandma Knitting Nook.
Maybe this is a middle class mentality, a new American bourgeois fantasy of desiring "creative wealth" as opposed to material wealth.
And this man is supposed to be running our country. ROFLMAO.
Chapters 6, 9, 11 and 12 see Darius in charge in Babylon. (his other name is Cyaxares II and he is a short-lived king) This is when Daniel is thrown into the lion’s den. Keep in mind that Daniel had been in captivity for 66 years at this point. (605 B.C. -539 B.C.)
During our summer vacation, she used to prepare it in larger quantity and store it in earthen pots which keep the chillness of the butter milk naturally for longer time. I guess this is also a one of the secrets which makes the butter milk more tastier.
If you are looking for inspiration, look at some of your baby photographs because all you need you will find there………….you will find the True You….Fearless and Free….ready to just BE.
Maybe that's it: they don't understand that in most of the midwest, people don't actually have a high culture of hate. They can love their team and passionately want to beat the opponent, but can also sit next to an opposing fan without coming to blows. Maybe Patriots fans think Indianapolis fans must be filled with hate and must be targeting it at the Patriots, so they have to defend themselves by sending that hate back.
PepsiCo – Co.’s board authorised a 4 per cent increase in dividend to USD 2.15 a share vs. previous USD 2.06 a share. (Fox Business/Reuters)
When we recall the event, a network of brain cells are “reconsolidated, rewritten, remade” to recreate what happened. Every time we access a memory, our brains are actually rewired.
The affiliate program sent me a direct link to the extra 25% off extravaganza (especially for mini stuff, which is ALL on sale), so if you are on a mobile device, you can access that at the bottom of the post (or in the sidebar for full-sized computers, etc.).
Open ur eyes!!
Someone flashed into the center of the mob that had congregated around the ball, and it sprung into the goal.
So it's up to us. And that means we have to think smart now, while we're young, and while expenses are high. If you want until you're 45, it is so much harder to fund your retirement. Even if you're only putting away a few hundred dollars a month, in the long run that can really grow (and now's a good time, because the stock market is relatively low).
-- NIT Tournament
"She did the whole nine yards," Thomas said, and noted again that Mrs. Obama was "very gracious."
When cooled, shred chicken either using clean fingers (I find this to be the easiest option) or two forks.
Article 141
Students in J457, Advanced Editing, are writing guest posts for this blog this semester. This is the seventh of those posts. Julianne Hoell is a senior studying editing and graphic design at UNC-Chapel Hill. In her free time, she watches Carolina basketball and frequents her two Twitter accounts — @jcapel21 is her personal account, and @thatBiz features her Labrador friend Biscuit.
A woman, who truly loves her man, must bear him as many children as possible. 11 to 13 children will do. A woman who has less than five children is uncaring and denies the man the ability to continue his lineage. She has no iota of love in her.
Driving home from Eau Claire, Wisconsin the other day we came upon this pastoral scene along highway 73 between Neillsville and Wisconsin Rapids.
too much at the best of times. I've actually started developing a
4. Being a good citizen. Active participation in the public arena appears to be on the decline. Yet many would argue that taking part in the “vita activa” of the community offers the best opportunities for the development of individual potentialities. Certainly it is a prerequisite for the ongoing health of the community. What personal qualities predict and support such involvement? What conditions militate against it?
Love can feel like appendicitis,
It’s God, it’s love, it’s love
sung umpteen times before you stuck.
I hope they carry happy memories that will spring up time and again and make them remember us. We one our side will always remember them fondly.
That's a lot of what these iPad2 Mission's help to fuel, on a personal level.
We say again that it is hard to see how the police could respond to a team of the type we have already described. We are not talking here about a bunch of drunken yobs putting the odd brick through a window after a hard night’s drinking. We are talking about ruthless and organized people who are part of larger organizations with specific, even nationwide, strategic objectives, one of which is the complete expulsion of Muslims from Zone C. Short of having a permanent police presence outside every Muslim home and establishment, which is obviously impossible, it is difficult to see how the police could take any effective action at all.
George, Belgium:
Hey, good is good but could be better
Pretty cool, huh? :D
We collectively held our breath again, and as my uncle slowly applied pressure to the gas I remember thinking, “I will never forget this moment. I could have just died.” As we slowly inched down the rest of that mountain road that night I remember thanking Jesus repeatedly in my head for not being dead.
Step Two: Work On That Bio!
Hank and Bobbie-Joe loved the Dixie Diner. If you’re ever finding yourself travelling from Memphis, through Arkansas to allas, Texas, wait til you get to Texarkana; don’t go to a chain to eat, do yourself a favour and visit the humbly, brilliant Dixie Diner.
So what can the government do about these changes? Today Opposition lightweight the shadow small business minister, Bruce Billson, made this comment in the same Age story quoted above:
2010: .344/.438/.656 with 7 homers
Jacques Rivette, The Duchess of Langeais
But there is no time,
Where was I?
Jim spoke about how he had learned to be bold when it comes to praying for healing. I was so moved by this because I have such a heart to pray for people. Yet it never fails, when I'm praying for healing, I battle with the voice in my head that says "what if it doesn't happen?"
The DA's Theo Coetzee said: "Moe Shaik is deeply involved in faction fights within the ruling party, and we must therefore assume that his appointment will further politicise the NIA."
Benjamin whimpered, signaling that he was about to start up again.
The Beothuk (pronounced “beo-thuk”) people of Newfoundland, a.k.a. “The Red Indians” because of the red ochre they smeared on their bodies, are truly one of the most fascinating and mysterious aspects of it. They are referred to as a “population isolate” because they developed their unique culture in total isolation, starting around 1 A.D. until—with the death of Shanawdithit (“Nancy April”) in1829—they were declared officially extinct.
The saying “If you want something done, ask a busy person.” is very true for me and I realize it doesn’t have to be this way.
Hmmm… better use four plates each to make sure they’re sturdy enough to withstand our great picnic. Another little rumble came from the very dark cloud above us. Nah… It’ll blow over.
Each day we've chosen a destination and ventured out into the city. Day one took us to a cafe started by YWAM years back, day two the kitchen we'll use should we get ambitious beyond the realms of microwave or toaster oven. And today, day three, led us towards The Tabernacle, YWAM Amsterdam's prayer room quietly nestled a street over from the heart of the Red Light District.
We (meaning Marianne)are exhausted after the relaunch of our website Long and Short Reviews. It's been renamed, redesigned, and we will be offering more than just romance reviews, interviews, etc. We are expanding our horizons and hope to soon offer more genres for your reading pleasure.
I'm glad to see that our children have a realistic view of marriage.
Try to remember what it felt like to be a child. To be small in a big world. To be powerless to take care of even your most basic needs. To face judgment and criticism from strangers and loved ones alike. To be punished for either expressing discontent to be somewhere (Stop crying, you're making a scene!) OR for trying to make the best of it by having fun (Calm down, you're making a scene!). To always be expected to enthusiastically (but politely) reply How high? every time an adult says Jump!
And my other friend told me: “You look good, you don’t need this stuff”. And I told him: “I look good, because I’m drinking this stuff”.
There are no actual prizes for the winners but I'm offering a virtual prize instead. I will put a link to your blog or website, or whatever it is you're wanting to promote, on my next blog post and give you some shout-outs on Twitter if you manage to score ten out of ten in the quiz. Please post your answers plus your blog link in the comments below. I'll announce the winners next week.
Matilda Whipplethorn is about to get what she’s always wanted, and it’s a bad thing. Being a babysitter isn’t much of a dream for the average thirteen-year-old, but Matilda is anything but average. She’s half a centimeter tall, invisible to the human eye, and hearing-impaired. Her mother won’t let her forget any of that. So for Matilda, adventures are in short supply. Finally agreeing to let Matilda take some responsibility, her mother gives her a list of emergency procedures for babysitting. The only problem; humans aren’t on the list.
Having a belief in a general teaching or philosophy is a good place from which to base your inquiries, but there are NO SUBSTITUTES for first-hand experience of the principles that are taught by any such philosophy. Most ones prefer it when another takes the responsibility of telling them what is right and what is not, so that they do not have to assume the responsibility of discerning for themselves what is truly the correct spiritual path for their own personal needs and desires.
This is her as a house martin, a very poignant piece when you read the accompanying text. You will need to click the link above to find it, and, if you do, make sure you check out ‘Don’t Be A Roadkill’.
I've never written one before. I've never written one before because although I've started millions* of first drafts, I've only finished two and I've only revised one and now I'm at that stage where I suppose I have to do the dreaded synopsis, followed by the even more dreaded query letter.
(1) An invention shall be considered to be new if it does not form part of the state of the art.(2) The state of the art shall be held to comprise everything made available to the public by means of a written or oral description, by use, or in any other way, before the date of filing of the European patent application. ...Facts
Full immersion is, in some people’s opinion, required to fully become fluent. One language learning site said, “In reality it is very unlikely for people to really become fluent in a language without extensive periods of some form of total language immersion.” Full immersion is great because it basically causes you to spend 100 percent of your time practicing your language skills. You basically get to go about your day, but instead of using English, you get to use your new language, and for people who tend to procrastinate and be lazy like me, this is a great way to force yourself to practice.
While you bury your head in the sand and go through life thinking "everything will be alright in the end" and there isn't any threat to this country, others like the EDL, will fight for our way of life....even yours!
If you have a moment, include her in your prayers. They would be much appreciated.
Social work, as I am sketching it out, has to be a profession whose priorities unfold via informed and collegial engagement with all sorts of “outsiders” who share our propensity for a motley assortment of do-gooder impulses. The profession had best be defined, then, as having a commitment to the detection of various social ills and to the structuring of collaborative solutions to, or ameliorations of, such maladies.
I encourage you - do not allow the fear of what could might possibly maybe happen prevent you from ever trying!
Does the financial planner or agent have a responsibility to his or her client as far as the best time is concerned? You betcha! Should these professionals have realized that disability insurance is the cornerstone of financial planning and have recommended it? You betcha! Why is it, then, that disability insurance isn’t sold or presented more than the meager amount reported? Is it due to lack of product knowledge, just an oversight or something else entirely?
And keep soaking it in,
The aroma has a weird peppery flavor from the yeast mixed with a caramel/nutty malt note, hard to describe but I liked it. Alcohol is nicely integrated but very noticeable. Mouth feel is silky smooth with a little more body than you would expect from a beer this dry. It even has pretty good head retention. Should be even better after another month or so in the cellar. I might even save a few of the 12 ounce bottles for a competition.
Whatever you want to call it, it was massive. It was hard to get into a photo unless you were a couple of blocks away.
It was a privilege to have a short conversation with her after the event, and now I must get down to reading the novels, starting with the semi-autobiographical Brixton Beach.
While it is soaking, prepare your wooden board. I cover the board with a good 'ol fashioned rubbish bin bag (the one the council collects rubbish in :) ), to prevent the water soaking into the wood. Make sure it is smooth and wrinkle-free...
Thank you all for reading x
To make your elastic casing, you want to stitch all around where you've pinned, leaving about a 2" gap at the back of your skirt to insert your elastic. I back stitched at the beginning and end of my stitch to make sure it didn't unravel while I was putting my elastic in.
I am sure it will be a great and not to forget Christmas party!!
Unfortunately upon retirement in December 2010, due to the sophisticated nature of the aircraft and the highly sensitive nature of the avionics used and an associated agreement with the United States the majority of F-111′s had to be disposed of. This was done in December 2011 when 23 airframes were buried in a landfill near Ipswich, Queensland. Luckily 13 were retained for museums including the RAAF Museum at Point Cook, Victoria.
I am still feeling rather shaken by this incident and will be taking an extended blogging break; I think I should move on now and chalk it up to experience.
Humans, as we know for being one our self, is a complex being. Though all humans share the same DNA sequence but the genes are wired differently in every person. The human behavior and approach are shaped more by the environment and less by the genetic makeup. We see certain characteristics specific to people from a particular region or religion and all is determined by the surrounding ambience. As individuals we may be our own person but when it comes to ‘communities/countries’ we behave in a certain predictable pattern guided by the common belief and value systems – DNA of their country (!). There are cultural factors intertwined. Therefore, same lens cannot be used to diagnose the problem and thus arrive at the solution. The person acting as the international interlocutor has to have in-depth knowledge of the people involved and the historical-cultural background of the countries engaged in the conflict.
Olson said they’re now using the protein to develop an obesity drug that might also be used to combat high cholesterol and Type 2 Diabetes. But researchers say that drug is still a long way from even being tested
2 leather
 Purchase local produce and other foods from local vendors whenever possible.
I inherited a couple of Hallie's photo albums--the pictures show what a character she was, even as a girl. She often dressed as a man and hammed it up with cigars and wine bottles. She and her friends camped out and hung around in Enosberg Falls, Vermont. There are pictures of her with her sisters and brother and their mother, my great grandmother, who died before I was born. It was so good to see them as young people, and see how they lived. This picture of Hallie in her white dress inspired some of my "Victorian Cheek" note cards (above). Pictures in the older album inspired many other art pieces, including my "Ghosts of Christmases Past" ornaments.
Day five: All my words suck. They suck, they suck, they suck. Why the heck did I ever think I could do this?
Offices for case managers and other staff are in each living unit as well as a multi-purpose room.
T: What'd you ask her?
16. A smile, and saying “hello” in the other person’s language can go a long way
Thanks Brynn!
Because some fellow students and I are going to the Texas Nursing Student Association conference in San Antonio on Thursday, we had our Skills lab this afternoon. Lab topic this week: Bathing and Hygiene.
The Grand Tower is to be located behind the existing Morritt Grand Buildings. This will also be a 5-storey building with 25 units. The Eco-Village, which will be located inland behind the shopping centre, will comprise three buildings with 3-storeys, providing a total of 45 units. The Residence building, to be located inland on the road, will be a 4-storey building with 32 units.
Having given it this much though, I believe I should break out the buffing cloth and revisit those sites. That is, if I can remember where they all are. That includes the one here, on WordPress which I’ve been wanting to change up for some time. It seemed a little depressing.
If you are going in April, bring ice picks for your shoes- best idea ever!! We had a lot of people compliment this choice as they were slipping on the ice. My favorite tho was when someone called us professionals. I was like, I am not professional and therefore require these not to die.
The fictionalized story is inspired by actual events that took place back in 2004 in Odessa, Texas — my hometown’s neighbor, fifteen miles to the west. It took me a while to put two and two together, but this story captured everyone’s attention in West Texas, especially mine. Why? Because one of my former high school teachers was included in the list of “Johns” at the time. Wow. Right? But I digress…
Overall, it was a very fun-filled event that not only the kids but also the parents had got so much fun especially during the egg hunting when children were running and parents were shouting.
We took a small trip to Gatlinburg, TN(Which was way too short!).
Best Director: I said Martin Scorsese. The real winner: Michel Hazanavicius
Spoiler Alert: If you didn't play green glass doors with us on Saturday (first of all, why not?) and still want to play don't read what's next...
...I splurged on the stamp sets for this range too(well when I say 'I' I mean my dh was coerced into buying these for my birthday!!) . I have clear embossed a couple of the images onto Dusty Attic Sheriff's Badges and then inked the edges with Stormy Sky Distress Ink...
Andrew’s parents arrived just in time for us to celebrate Peter’s birthday at Gordon Ramsey’s Restaurant on Hospital Road. We had a 3 course meal that was nothing short of spectacular, both in taste, decoration and menu. We ended up with an extra entrée and desert as a gift from the chef as we told them we were celebrating all 4 birthdays (which are within a few weeks of each other-good move!!)
Wilfred Woodhouse (UKIP) 349
They are not welcome in any part of Our Country and their increasing numbers of religious centres are certainly not wanted and so when people like Tipo Choudhury, a restaurant owner currently assisting in the colonisation of Penzance buy up former chapels and convert them into religious training centres they should not be surprised if local people react and speak out. As did Councillor Thomas Hill;
The whole country mourns the loss of these warriors. We in the Teams mourn the loss of our brothers – men so much like ourselves, men who we knew personally, or if not, men with whom we would have felt right at home. We struggle to understand the pain of this loss to their families and closest friends. The heaviest burden of this war has been borne by the families of the service members killed and wounded. It is a constant, drip, drip, drip of names of good men, our brothers, killed or wounded, with the occasional mega-tragedy, like the one that hit us in August. It impacts all of us, some certainly more than others.
René, however, seemed to be of the mindset that all guys are rough and tough jet-setters and all women are curvy, sexy femmy femmes who melt in their arms at the mention of sex. And sometimes there are blood, guns, explosions and various dangers abounding.
Image: Mo's Digital: New Baby
Brittany: We want you to look FABULOUS! We're bringing luxury goods to our brides at a fraction of the cost. It's easy, simple, fun and fashionable. Rent. Wed. Return.
BCM will provide video cameras and tape for field work. BCM will have a MacBook Pro with Final Cut 7 available. We are inventorying assets and also let me know what kind of equipment you may be able to provide:
Public? He was sat in a public place alright. Right infront of the front door. I mean, it was quite busy yeah but come on pal, It wasn’t exactly the warmest of nights and the draft every time someone walked in was doing no favours for my already wind-swept hair.
Whether it’s in a tube, pot or tin, there’s no doubt that lip balms and butters are a must for lip care!
When our son was a schoolboy in England, aged about 14, he and his class made a trip to Normandy and to the American and British Cemeteries for The Fallen there.
Perhaps you have been unfortunate enough, like myself, to be held responsible for someone else’s mess. My dog is a female, so she squats to urinate. More than once, an ignorant person has seen her urinate and either blatantly told me I should pick up after my dog, or they gave me the look that says it all. This infuriates me beyond words. I can honestly say that I have never left a mess behind. I always carry a bag dispenser and always pick up after my dog, whether it’s in my development, at the park, the beach, or visiting another neighborhood. Sadly, few in my development are as considerate. Dog messes, large and small, can be found scattered over all the grassy areas. Some apartment complex property managers have begun using DNA dog poop testing kits to identify the perpetrators. Not a bad idea.
Eyes: Kawaii Floral Eyes- Green-Splash (Kawaii Fair)
“In one old tale from Mull the Cailleach immersed herself in the waters of Loch Bà every one hundred years to replenish her youth and beauty. As she descended one morning out of the hills to take the loch’s elixir of life she heard the bark of a shepherd’s collie (representing the domestication of animals and landscape). Pausing to listen, her hundred years timed out and she stumbled and died just short of the water’s edge.”
As of now she still won't drink the milk/formula out of a sippy cup - that will be our next challenge.
The colors and sights in the market are fantastic—fruits, vegetables, flowers, all kinds of housewares….and then you get to the meat section which is also fantastic but a bit more of a challenge for the nose!
the center of a swarm of bees.
Office Solutions Plus LLC handles depositions in many different types of court cases and even provides rush depositions. OS Plus has over 15 years of experience and uses the latest technology to get your projects done quickly and efficiently. When looking for court reporting/depositions, look no further than Office Solutions Plus LLC!
Direct. VIII. Help each other by reading together the most convicting, cutting, life­giving books. The ones most spiritual. Do not waste your time on light, weak, milk­toast ministries and books. Make friendships together with the holiest persons. This is not neglecting your duty to one another, but that all the helps working together may be the more effectual.(35)
BONUS: Buy 4 Cereals, GET 1 FREE
Maybe it’s just more of my wishful thinking. Do we all have somebody? Can we ever make that connection to somebody who understands? Is there really a spark or am I already just a pile of burnt out ashes, waiting to be spread like dust across the wasteland of my own dirty duvet?
Do we state “professional”? Microsoft Author the year 2010 makes it simple to develop and print out credit cards that make it appear as though you’ve employed the web designer and purchased them from the print out store.
"The Finishers" have offered to do a matching grant from now until midnight Friday (EST) of $300. Every dollar up to $300 will be doubled between now and then. I'm praying for just a little more, though. I'm praying that you'll all be so excited to see Beth and Dan within $400 of their goal (which is where they'll be when the match is met) that you'll keep giving generously until they're FULLY FUNDED!
I will always try and visit your own blogs and leave a comment on your current post. However, if I have been asked a question, I will usually reply to it on my own post.
On our way to Panera we got side tracked by talking about 'adult things'.... aka: Minivans. Yeah- boring, right? While we were walking we spotted a new Honda Odyssey that was parked right at a meter. We oogled it, loving the new design, the fancy back windows, the way the leather in the new Odyssey was 'smooth' and not puckered like in the old Odyssey..... We went around it a few times to check out all of it's curves. We talked about how much we rather liked it- and maybe that would be our next mini-van purchase.... We were quite satisfied with our little chat and decided to move on to eating something. Chip stopped dead in his tracks and said "You know we're parents when we oogle the mini-van..... and completely not notice that this little beauty was parked right behind it".....
I'd message you my number, but its also my pin.
Peel baked meringue from parchment paper and store in airtight container or serve immediately!
There may be disappointment that Northern Ireland supporters will not attend the first 'Irish derby' since 1999, but the fans' decision to stay at home - and their reasons for doing so - should be respected.
WEEK 3: Organize Pantry, Spices and Food Storage
One of my all-time favourite two-player boardgames are Manoeuvre from GMT Games. It is a fast-playing wargame of the 19th century battlefield. I have mentioned it in an earlier post, that the Manoeuvre designer, Jeff Horger, is working on a fantasy version, based on Manoeuvre. I'm excited!
A second article quotes Commissioner Brian Paddick as saying:
I asked former Supervisor Chris Daly, above left, if they were occupying City Hall overnight, and he said, "No, it didn't make much sense since there was nobody at all in the building, and the only people we were bothering was the bride who was roaming around."
facts without light
I kind of embarrassed myself...multiple times...in front of a bunch of people and it's seriously consuming my thoughts...nothing major- but I'm sure there are people in my life who had a late Sunday conversation where my name popped up "April's kind of weird isn't she?"
“Not well,” he declared. He has been critical of the performance of the ESDC, which has been led by appointees of departing Governor George Pataki, a Republican. "This final hearing, I think, gave us an opportunity to show where there are major problems."
My last post was about my son, Brian, an update of his life after his second tour in Iraq.
Over & Out,
Four damn years. Then we were talking again. Well your girlfriend made us talk again. It was an awkward situation. An ex being asked by the girlfriend about the past. It was an awkward situation as I imagined it when she said she wanted to see me. I told you, right? And you said you don’t feel at ease about your ex befriending your girlfriend. Maybe I shouldn’t be. That’s why I told you to patch things up between you two so your ex won’t have to be in the picture. Then you both began ranting to me about the faults and flaws in your relationship. But why me? Of all people, why me? After four years of non-communication, why me? I thought at first that the reason is because I was the one who knew you best. I was. And then things got overboard. Or must I say over me. You said you’re not sure if she wants to save your relationship or revive ours. She said there was no way you could make things better. I said you’re both responsible for and in the relationship you have.
Reading this anthology was fun! It was like speed dating - spending a few minutes with each story and deciding if you like the storyline, characters, the author's writing style and so forth, then deciding if you'd like to pursue it further. Wait. I've never done the speed dating thing, maybe there's some unpleasantness associated with that. Since it was completely enjoyable, let me find a better analogy. Okay, I've got one! It was like going to Baskin Robbins and trying 16 of their 31 flavors. Yeah, you might like some better than others, but THEY'RE ALL ICE CREAM . . . . . WINNING! Plus, you can have them all in one sitting if you want (why does everything lead to food, with me?).
Two days later, my water broke for sure. This time it was clear, and I immediately went to the ER.
not inserting any 2011 or 2012 NBA rookies in to their product? The only way to get a rookie card from either year is to pull a redemption card from select products. The promotion is called Panini America’s Dual Rookie Redemption program and there will be randomly redemption cards of the top draft picks from
Meanwhile, year-end best-of lists abound and I'm adding to the collective ignorance with giddy enthusiasm. Today at Ransom Notes I posted on my favorite first entries in new series, and last week I had fun with the list My Year in Villains which featured evil little shits from a distinguished list of authors including N@B alum Scott Phillips, Jane Bradley, John Rector, Duane Swierczynski and (honorary N@B dude 'cause Corydon was more or less the N@B road show yeah?), Donald Ray Pollock.
But a joy within guides you.
The roots extend out about the same distance as the plant is tall, and are only an inch or two below the surface, with no tap root, as the only water is right at the surface.
My photo measures 8in x 5.5 in.
Yeah, now I said it
Here are the readings for the upcoming week:
“I’ll think about it mother, no promises. But if it comes to that I know who it will be.” I wave her off, “So stop worrying about it.”
Limited Edition MAC Call Me Bubbles Quad, “Brash” – Apple on the crease area in “wiper windshield” movements
(Professor Rashib uses his cane to point at the blank sheets of paper that are lying on the floor. The girls take one each.)
Our wonderful sponsors for the Valentines for Kids Challenge are: Stamp Shoppe Creations and their prize is a $15 gift certificate to their on-line shop; Delicious Doodles and they are offering one random winner 4 digital images of their choice; and Bugaboo who is giving 7 free digis of the winner's choice! And of course we will also be picking our Top Three and giving them a blog badge and a chance at joining us as a guest design team member for a future challenge.
Just as having Sarah Palin as the second major woman VP candidate actually set back the cause of feminism, so, too is lauding a spoiled rich girl as a pop culture groundbreaker. If you’re still perpetuating the underlying structures of inequality from your lofty position, you’re not actually advancing the cause of anyone but yourself.
But the plot unfolds to show that Kowalski's neighbours are as racist as he is, and in fact he not only redeems his own character, but becomes a heroic figure in his neighbourhood by taking on the gangs and, at the same time, taking Thao, his neighbour's son, under his wing. How 'racist' is he really? Kowalski's most vicious scorn is reserved for the white boy who wears his cap backwards and tries to talk 'black' to the black kids. Kowalski rightly calls him a p*ssy for failing to stick up for his girlfriend.
Wiz was caught with weed in Nashville on April 21 … after cops received complaints about marijuana smoke at a local Holiday Inn.
I also hope to apply my gift for mobilizing people (and mermaids!) to including disenfranchised Coney lovers in the local government processes that will determine it's future.
Black and white cardigan with pockets, Mossimo (thrifted). Orange T, Merona. Jeans, Lucky.
At one point towards the end of the night, the coaches all walked past the stage where we’re stood, and I was within about six inches from Sir Tom (not Tim, Holly) Jones. Will was within spitting distance too.
2 tablespoons sesame oil
Officials in the West Clermont Local School District are meeting with adjusters and contractors to repair damage to the new Amelia Elementary’s electrical systems. A number of electrical controls and appliances were damaged when a car hit a utility pole causing a “major power surge,” said Ed Dyer, the district’s director of operations. The damage will cost several hundred thousand dollars and includes the air conditioner chiller, the variable speed drives (which control the motors to keep the building’s energy efficient,) the boiler controls, the light ballasts, the elevator controls and a mixer in the kitchen, Dyer said. “Those are the damages we know right now, but anything electronic is suspect. We’re in the process of going through everything now,” he said. Lt. Randy McElfresh, Batavia post commander of Ohio State Highway Patrol, said the crash occurred at 6:20 a.m. Monday, Aug. 2, at Chapel Road and Ohio 132. “The crash burned up Duke’s transformer and, as a result, the surge went into Amelia Elementary and caused major damage,” Dyer said. The elementary school repairs will be submitted as an insurance claim, Dyer said. The repairs should not delay the start of school. “This is major, but we’ve assembled a team and we expect to have everything up and running by the first day of school (Sept. 7,)” Dyer said. “We have a month. It’s not a lot of time, but it’s time.”
Second day of Ranger U saw the lovely Claudine teaching what she does best, Mixed Media techniques. Fabby, no need for a microphone for her. She is absolutely petite and doll like with the most amazing voice, I don't know where it comes from lol.
Of course, I have no idea if this particular edition is even remotely close to what would have resided in those original batches, but if it is, then I can see why the Master Distiller would direct his assistants to file away the recipe in safe keeping, knowing he’d discovered something extraordinary.
The SFMTA runs an archaic transit system and has yet to provide efficient, effective and reliable service. This has little to do with revenue and can be attributed to the poor structure of the organization as well as the seemingly tied hands when it comes to making financial decisions. The small amount of revenue that extended meters will bring will not fix the SFMTA’s underlying structural and organizational problems.
What I think Pollan’s comment lacks, though, is a bit of context. Not all vegetarians are “animal-rights purists.” More importantly, it isn’t just the purists who have criticized Pollan’s stance on vegetarianism.
There is one more objection that cannot be avoided, this one from familiar arguments in the area of personal identity. A defining argument in the area of personal identity is that between advocates of physical continuity and advocates of psychological continuity. At least since the time of Locke the majority view has been that psychological theories of personal identity are more persuasive than physical theories. Imagine (the story goes) that one’s mind has been switched with another (physical) person’s: mind A in body B and mind B in body A. Where (one asks the students) are you now? Most people have the intuition that they go where their mind goes, that is, that they are their mind as opposed to their body if forced to make the choice. It is significant that it does seem possible to conceive of one’s mind separated from one’s body. Isn’t that a problem for any physicalist theory of mind? I think it is, and I will take up the issue of what it is actually possible to conceive, and what that possibility might show, in Chapter Three in the discussion of the “absent qualia” arguments, the possibility of “zombies” etc.
This love triangle looks to hold something that will be fun to see unravel.
namibia is a vast and wild country in the south west of africa. it borders on south africa, botswana and angola. by means of a narrow panhandle in the nort east it also reaches out to zimbabwe and zambia. on the west it has a huge and treacherous stretch of coast along a freezing cold atlantic ocean.
Mr Sheridan then produced three pages of what he told the court were copies of a notebook found when Mr Mulcaire’s house was raided by the police. These notebooks appeared to contain Mr Sheridan’s address, postcode, mobile telephone number, the name of his telephone provider and what Mr Sheridan said was his “PIN” number. There was also a reference to “Gregg” in a note beside the details and two dates, 14/09/04 and 26/07. Mr Sheridan put it to Mr Bird that these were the dates when the NotW was preparing their articles about him. Mr Bird pointed out that the second entry had no year, but agreed that the dates were around the time of the publication of Anvar Khan’s book, Pretty Wild and the NotW’s subsequent article based on it. In light of this evidence, Mr Sheridan asked Mr Bird if he was “surprised that a private investigator with an “illegal track record”, an “exclusive contract” with the NotW and based in London, would have “my details.” Mr Bird said he was.
By now, most people have known of the latest teen book craze – the Hunger Games. Apparently this has been some crazy phenomenon even before the movie has come out, but now it’s really gone to the wolves. What I remember of the Hunger Games before this year was the time my school newspaper attempted to do book reviews my sophomore year and Mockingjay, the final in the series, was enthusiastically reviewed by the features editor. I promised her I would read the books but never managed to…until now. I didn’t get a chance to read before watching the movie however.
So who are the people that I’ve been happy to follow? And did they have all of these traits? What was it that won my respect and admiration? The trait that stands out the most in that list to me is integrity. John Adair describes it as “personal wholeness” and sticking to values such as “goodness and truth”. For me the most important thing a leader can show is honesty. Thinking back the leaders I have been less inclined to follow are not the ones who didn’t show traits such as confidence or enthusiasm, but those who did not act with honesty. I felt they were not being honest with me or themselves. I didn’t trust them. Part of being honest and showing integrity is the concept of “personal wholeness”, or being true to oneself. A good leader should not try to be someone else; they need to be honest with themselves about who they are and what they believe.
dirt or rocks
Bob and I had been together for two years but he’d never invited me to visit him on base. We were living two thousand miles apart because Bob’s first wife, who had been his sweetheart since high school, decided that she didn’t like flying, the Marine Corps, or the Deep South, which is where most Marine air bases are located. She left him, and I finally figured out that Bob couldn’t invite me to visit him on base for fear I’d feel the same way and also leave him.
I once bought a card that featured a cantankerous elderly woman. She said, “Lord, give me patience. And can you hurry it up.”
COTTAGE-IN-THE-MAKING?
Jelly Magazine was on 30% Sale, so I couldn't resist buying XD Even though I don't like every style I just love to read japanese fashion magazines, it just makes so happy to see those beautiful clothing and models. Can't wait fo the new issues.
On that note, I'm surprised that I haven't seen more on the blogosphere about African-American authors and diversity in books -- particularly in YA, where there is a concern about "whitewashing" book covers and characters. The reasoning behind it is that people are more likely to read books about people who are like them. Girls read books about girls, boys read books about boys, and white people read books about white people.
In particular, I’ll be looking into this product:
It took about 5 years, but after I drew them, they started making sense. I ended up experiencing – what I had drawn. And, just to make it clear, these drawings were quite unusual. Quite fanciful.
More severe cases may lead to meningitis or septicaemia.
Not until I read The Absolutely True Story of a Part Time Indian by Sherman Alexie (Little, Brown, 2007) did I realize that young adult fiction could be so real. Or so raw. I was blown away by that book and how authentically the main character was written.
7. Spring, Summer, Fall, Winter...and Spring
This 1990 release is a VERY powerful record - a record that gains its power not only from its breathless lack of speed, but from its immense sheets of guitars. Stephen Immerwahr's vocals sound as if they're vocalized from the depths of despair, an icy sheen that just adds to the remoteness, the emotional gravity, of the record. And indie legend Chris Brokaw - doubling up here on both guitars *and* drums - has to be an utterly fantastic drummer just due to the nature of how precisely slow a timekeeper he had to be.
shiver
Once you have reached cootie-free doneness, you just lift those yummy little suckers out of the pan and plate them!
It had become very much colder. It was a brilliant, starry night. There was no moon and I have never seen the stars shine brighter; they appeared to stand right out of the sky, sparkling like cut diamonds. A very light haze, hardly noticeable, hung low over the water. I have spent much time on the ocean, yet I have never seen the sea smoother than it was that night; it was like a mill pond, and just as innocent looking, as the great ship quietly rippled through it.
I was bored when we shopped at the farmers’ market. It felt uncool. Unfashionable people seemed to frequent the farmers’ market. I assumed this was another daily typical market experienced by every Canadian. It never occurred to me, a farmers’ market could be a tourist destination.
morning mist
I don’t want to get too academic about this, but words are as beautiful as pictures and in some cases more powerful. For instance, when we think of the word ‘sad’ it will conjure a million different images depending upon our personal experiences of ‘sad’. When an artist paints a picture of ‘sad’ it is usually a picture taken from the artist’s experience and (usually) cannot compete with the personal experiences of the observer. Of course, great art can chime with an individual’s experience and elicit intellectual or emotional responses.
Anyhoo, we were standing there with our cart full of lumber and I notice this display of bender board, 3 3/4 inch wide, 1/4 inch thick, by 96 inch long strips of MDF, used by concrete contractors to shape curvy sidewalks or driveways.
Perhaps there’s lots of arguing and legal research ahead, though we asked Michael Robertson, currently head of time-shifting radio startup DAR.fm, whether these interactivity expansions were kosher. He seemed skeptical. “Don’t know about the lawsuits, but SiriusXM has the same license as Pandora, AccuRadio, etc. for their over-the-net service,” Robertson told Digital Music News. “None of those services allow any rewinding. So if I’m those other services I’m now at a disadvantage. Is rewinding allowed by the licenses or not? If it is then how much is allowed? One song? 5? 10? I think net radio services will continue to let interactivity creep into the experience.﻿”
Here's the bottom line: every minute you spend here is a minute you aren't spending on your writing.
9. Polish Strips: AWESOME. AWESOME. AWESOME. AWESOME. Easy to use, fun to wear, and dude they stay on for like 2 weeks no prob (especially the glitter ones) which is way longer than what I'm used to polish-wise.
But then why are more and more distance runners wearing compression socks? Surely they must have some sort of benefits? Having worm compression calf guards on my first half last month, I suspect that this phenomenon has a lot to do with the fact that compression helps minimize muscle damage and fend off soreness during a long run. I could really feel the sleeves keeping the soreness at bay during the run. Usually, my calves would stiffen up as soon I hit 14k, but during the race I didn’t feel any soreness up until I crossed the finish line and stopped running!
"scalloped laced " image (same) . I used my white uni-ball pen around the sunglasses and on the scalloped border. Now, am I gona mail him?? Yes...not sure "to who" yet! :) lol THIS is also for the following challenges: "Use it Tuesday" #27= using what you hoard = BG scraps are ALL over my art room! :), the C4C challenge blog= use green, Simon Says = "A bit O green", Daring Card Makers "lucky green", AND Catered Crop= use stitching (around the post card) TFL!
SPACE KIDS & MK ULTRA
Doug Sahm was the Texas equivalent of Oklahoma's Leon Russell. Both were versatile and eclectic musicians who put out some great music of their own and who collaborated with a lot of great musicians. Both have been favorites of mine for a very long time -- I feel a very personal connection to their music.
How very sad to be a weed!
At the moment we have the following columns running. If anything here sounds like something you might want to contribute to, let me know either in the comments below, or IM me on twitter (@PBMcCoy - if you can't IM me, just mention me and I'll follow you so we can chat).
It is sometimes quite a challenge to cook and watch your kid but since we were four of us today, one of us were able to watch the kids all the time so others can concentrate on cooking.
Tacky Tourist memorabilia – As a teenager I went to both Mexico and Italy for several weeks. Upon returning I brought home ridiculous amounts of key chains, fake purses, magnets, picture frames, postcards, pens and t-shirts.
“I know,” said Korfu, “but he waited for all of us to fall asleep I think…”
Ginger paste 2 teaspoons
Praise God! God bless Him who comes in the Name of the Lord! God bless the King of Israel! Amen!
"Oooh...pretty purple shoes! I looooove those!"
I curse the well-constructed hardware that keeps me prisoner, and prepare to run again, just like I did a hundred thousand times before and just like I will a hundred thousand times again.
Another lesson I learned early on was that it was easier to “spill the beans” about my own foibles and failures before my brothers did. This is a lesson I have carried into adulthood.
I suppose it’s best if I don’t answer the Netflix question because it’s not available in Guyana and I just get by on information I read. I will say, though, that even though I understand the entire hubbub that followed the price increase and the structural changes that the consumers were being a bit ridiculous because considering how accessible the company has made watching film and TV shows I
Surely He is God who judges in the earth.”
But then another identical jet—or was it the same?—would appear behind a different hill, or it would come circling up from another direction entirely, and it began to feel, my friend explained, as if he had inadvertently driven into the middle of a kind of quantum event, with the same—or was it?—airplane appearing and disappearing, over and over again, reappearing and swooping back from different angles, all the while mis-timed with its own acoustic side-effects.
down yonder road, sir?
I choose a thread to match the backing (rather than the binding) and use a long length of it doubled up. I thread the two cut ends through the needle and the uncut loop hangs at the other end. I put my needle through this loop when making the first stitch to secure the thread without having to use a knot. I sew an uneven ladder stitch - about a quarter inch in the binding (I just zip along inside the fold) and then a smaller stitch into the quilt back and batting before heading back up into the binding. And I love using binding clips to hold it all in place; much more friendly than pins.
Plants
The babies in the crate near my feet have quieted too. Zoe the Corgi, has wandered into the room. She stops and sniffs at the pullet on my lap. Irma chirps and stands up, a bit upset at the intrusion. Zoe moves to the corner and curls up in the corner still with her eye on Irma. The pullet easily dozes off. It seems it’s nap time here, near Portage Bay.
Greg is a figure who’s recognized by many craft beer fans as he is often seen and heard as the “face” and “voice” of Stone Brewing. Indeed, Greg acts out his passion for Stone Brewing — and for great beer in general — in the form of musings, declarations, raves, rants, propositions, actions and myriad contributions to the community at large through multiple media including books, blogs, videos, social media, public appearances and more.
3 almost
ME: OMG GET IN YOUR LANE!
i forgive myself for accepting and allowing myself to imagine myself being abused within my mind and feeling aroused to that image
The holidays are a funny thing for me now being in the southern hemisphere. Christmas is in the summertime for one. It just seems... odd. But we put up the tree and played Christmas music anyway. Audrey kept trying to eat the tree and the ornaments.
· Be here now
Looking at this list I can honestly say that on most days – then and now – I am actually able to do most of these things. Some practices come easier than others… for instance I have been really good at practicing gratitude but taking care of my body (number 12 on the list) has been put on the back burner.
At 21 all you really do is worry about their future, mistakes they will make that you can't protect them from, moving out from the protection of their home, heartache, dangers and pervs in vans (still).
The train blasts its wet jeer
Then I realised.
